Mobile: News - CNET





 



CNET
Mobile


Mobile
Latest News








                                    This is what the Galaxy S8 looks like under a macro lens
                            
The Samsung Galaxy S8 is undoubtedly a beautiful phone, even the details you can barely see. CNET photographer Josh Miller used a macro lens to photograph some of its tiniest features.

Galleryby Patrick HollandJuly 28, 2017 5:00 AM PDT









                                    Huawei's Honor 6A wants to be your wallet's best friend
                            
The 5-inch phone has a metal body, octa-core processor and a 13-megapixel camera.

Reviewby Andrew HoyleJuly 28, 2017 3:10 AM PDT










                                    Trent Reznor ponders social media, tech execs as rock stars
                            
Commentary: The Nine Inch Nails frontman and Apple Music heavy weighs in on music stars with vast social media presences.

Articleby Chris MatyszczykJuly 27, 2017 5:46 PM PDT









                                    Are you psychic? New app claims it can tell you
                            
Commentary: Am I Psychic? says it uses scientific methods to show whether you're, you know, paranormal.

Articleby Chris MatyszczykJuly 27, 2017 2:33 PM PDT


Recent Galleries
See all galleries




This is what the Galaxy S8 looks like under a macro lens






Meet the drop-resistant Moto Z2 Force and its crazy mods






15 new features in Android O you need to know about






Instagram tips from 7 pros with thousands of followers











                                    The second screen on this Android phone might not suck
                            
Can this Android phone break the curse?

Reviewby Jessica DolcourtJuly 27, 2017 1:32 PM PDT









                                    Samsung Pay could come to non-Samsung phones
                            
Samsung's mobile payment feature one-ups Apple Pay and Android Pay in one major way.

Articleby Gordon GottsegenJuly 27, 2017 12:33 PM PDT









                                    Moto Z2 Force is built to survive your accidents
                            
Motorola's newest modular phone has a shatter-resistant display, and works with a new 360-degree snap-on camera.

Videoby Scott SteinJuly 27, 2017 12:32 PM PDT









                                    7 things to consider when choosing a low-cost carrier
                            
Thinking of ditching your Big Four provider in favor of something cheaper? Here's what you need to know first.

Articleby Rick BroidaJuly 27, 2017 11:42 AM PDT

VideosSee all videos



Moto Z2 Force is built to survive your accidents






Cheap Samsung phone gives us deja vu






6 rumors about Apple Watch 3






The HP Spectre x2's stand sets it apart











                                    LG's flagship G6 smartphone isn't doing so hot
                            
Losing ground to Samsung, Apple and others, the electronics company's mobile business has a "challenging" second quarter.

Articleby Dara KerrJuly 27, 2017 11:36 AM PDT









                                    Chip vulnerability could crash your outdated phone via Wi-Fi
                            
If your phone doesn't have the latest update, leaving your Wi-Fi open might let hackers take over your device.

Articleby Alfred NgJuly 27, 2017 10:16 AM PDT









                                    Facebook tries to make chatting with bots more natural
                            
It’s just another way the social network is pushing you toward its Messenger chat app.

Articleby Richard NievaJuly 27, 2017 10:01 AM PDT









                                    Your future AR home movies will look like 80s music videos
                            
A-ha's "Take On Me" gets reshot in augmented reality, thanks to Apple's ARKit

Articleby Scott SteinJuly 27, 2017 9:53 AM PDT


 Show More





This week on CNET News
See all








How I learned to stop worrying and love high-tech meditation

Sci-Tech









Jeff Bezos no longer world’s richest person after Amazon earnings

Internet









A flaw in wireless networks lets hackers pretend to be you

Security









Twitter’s not growing anymore, and investors are freaking out

Tech Industry









Meteor shower season is here and this is the weekend to watch

Sci-Tech



 
Hot Products





Amazon Dash Wand with Alexa (2017)

                                                                            Amazon's Alexa-enabled Dash Wand is fun and nearly free
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                    MSRP
$20.00













Samsung Galaxy S8

                                                                            A month later, the Galaxy S8 is still pretty freaking awesome
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                               $669.88













OnePlus 5

                                                                            The affordable OnePlus 5 impresses us again
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                    












Apple iPad 2017 (9.7-inch)

                                                                            Apple's new 9.7-inch iPad is a great tablet at a great price
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                               $329.00













Microsoft Surface Pro (2017)

                                                                            Still a Pro, despite an unadventurous update
                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                               $799.00












BEST LIST




Find the best hybrids on the market!
Hybrid technology can be applied to any type of car, and the best show the most significant fuel economy improvements over a similar gasoline-only car.

SHOW ME NOW






 






 





Fitbit - Wikipedia





















 






Fitbit

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Fitbit Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: FIT


Industry
Consumer electronics


Founded
San Francisco, California, United States (May 1, 2007 (2007-05-01))[1]


Founders
James Park
Eric Friedman


Headquarters
San Francisco, California, United States



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

James Park (CEO)
Eric Friedman (CTO)


Products
Fitbit Tracker


Subsidiaries
Pebble


Website
www.fitbit.com


Fitbit (NYSE: FIT) is an American company headquartered in San Francisco, California, known for its products of the same name, which are activity trackers, wireless-enabled wearable technology devices that measure data such as the number of steps walked, heart rate, quality of sleep, steps climbed, and other personal metrics involved in fitness. The first product released was the Fitbit Tracker.[2] Some evidence has found that the use of similar devices results in less weight loss rather than more.[3]



Contents


1 Products

1.1 Health effects
1.2 Accuracy
1.3 Recall


2 History
3 Reception

3.1 Awards
3.2 Privacy concerns
3.3 Surveillance


4 See also
5 References
6 External links



Products[edit]
Main article: List of Fitbit products




The Fitbit Flex, with the functioning unit out of the replaceable wristband.


Alongside the activity trackers, Fitbit offers a website and mobile app for iOS, Android and Windows 10 Mobile.[4] The trackers can be synced to smart devices via Bluetooth or uploaded to a computer running Windows or macOS using the Bluetooth USB dongle. Users have the ability to log their food, activities, and weight, to track over time and can set daily and weekly goals for themselves for steps, calories burned and consumed, and distance walked. Calories in versus calories out is more accurately measured when app users keep their tracker on. However, the app can be used without a tracker to measure calories on a lifestyle app. The app offers a community page where users can challenge themselves and compete against other users. The social element anticipates an increase in motivation, finding that users take an average of 700 more steps per day when they have friends on the app.[5] Users can choose to share their progress pictures and achievement badges.
Health effects[edit]
In those who are overweight or obese, a 2016 study indicates that the use of wearable technology combined with standard behavioral weight loss intervention results in less weight loss after two years of use when compared to usual weight loss interventions.[3] There was no evidence that the devices altered the amount that people exercised or their diet compared to control.[3] A 2015 study found use of lifestyle apps demonstrate promising results in promoting healthy living in adults.[6] It is unclear whether these devices affect the amount of physical activity children engage in.[7]
Accuracy[edit]
A small 2014 study of eight fit band devices during a 69-minute workouts that included 13 different activities found the bands were at best "reasonably accurate", with the Fitbit Zip and Fitbit One scoring 10.1% and 10.4% error ratings, respectively.[8]
A small 2015 study had participants wear multiple devices on their wrists and hips performing different walking/running speeds on a treadmill. Fitbit devices worn on the hip accurately measured steps taken within 1 step of 100% accuracy. Devices worn on the wrist, however, were off by an average of 11 steps per minute. When measuring the number of calories burned, Fitbit devices worn on the hip underestimated by an average of 6%, while devices worn on the wrist overestimated calories burned by 21%. Authors concluded that both the Fitbit One and Fitbit Flex devices reliably measured step counts and energy expenditure, with hip-based Fitbit devices being more accurate than wrist-based devices.[9] These measurements did not address the question of health effects.
Recall[edit]
Fitbit, working with the Consumer Protection Safety Commission, recalled the Fitbit Force on February 20, 2014 because some users experienced allergic reactions to the materials used in the product.[10] On March 12, 2014 the Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC) made the recall official.[11] At that time it was revealed that There were 9,900 reports of skin irritation and 250 reports of blistering .[11] The product is no longer for sale on Fitbit's website.
In April 2017, a woman claimed her Fitbit Flex 2 malfunctioned and caught on fire, causing second-degree burns on her arm.[12] Following an investigation, Fitbit is adamant the cause of the exploding tracker was due to external forces, assuring their customers they are not aware of any other complaints and they can confidently wear their own Fitbit with no concerns.[13]
History[edit]
Headquartered in San Francisco, California, Fitbit was founded on May 1, 2007 by James Park (CEO) and Eric Friedman (CTO). On May 7, 2015, Fitbit announced it had filed for IPO with a NYSE listing.[14] The IPO was filed for $358 million.[15] The company's stock began trading with the symbol "FIT"[16] on June 18, 2015.[17] After Fitbit's stocks fell more than 50% in 2016, CEO James Park announced in October that the company was undergoing a major transformation from what he called a "consumer electronics company" to a "digital healthcare company."[18]
On December 7, 2016, Fitbit officially announced that they acquired assets from Pebble, including key personnel, as the company decided to stop producing wearable technology. The acquisition excludes Pebble's hardware products.[19][20]
In January 2017, Fitbit acquired Romania-based smartwatch startup Vector Watch SRL for $15 million and it also paid $23 million for Pebble, a smartwatch brand that started as a Kickstarter campaign.[21][22]
Reception[edit]




Dedicated Fitbit retail stand stocked with different Fitbit Flex trackers


Awards[edit]
Fitbit has won numerous awards, including runner-up at TechCrunch50 in 2008[23] and CES 2009 Innovation honoree and best in the Health & Wellness category.[24] In 2016, Fitbit ranked 37 out of the 50 most innovative companies for that year.[25]
Privacy concerns[edit]
To set up and use the hardware, one has to create an account with Fitbit and agree to data collection, transfer and privacy rules.[26]
Starting in June 2011, Fitbit was criticized for its website's default activity-sharing settings, which made users' manually-entered physical activities available for public viewing.[27] All users had the option to make their physical activity information private, but some users were unaware that the information was public by default. One specific issue, which technology blogs made fun of, was that some users were including details about their sex lives in their daily exercise logs, and this information was, by default, publicly available.[28] Fitbit responded to criticism by making all such data private by default and requesting that search engines remove indexed user profile pages from their databases.[27]
The company's devices have also been used in criminal investigations; in one instance, a rape claim against an unnamed intruder was turned around to a criminal charge for false reports based on data from the claimant's Fitbit.[29][30][31][32][33]
Surveillance[edit]
A Fitbit played a role in solving a murder.[34] Connie Dabate was murdered by her husband Richard Dabate. Initially, Richard framed the situation, telling police and law enforcement officials that an intruder had broken into their home and fatally shot his wife. However, Connie’s Fitbit tracker showed that she was at the gym at the time Richard told police his wife was shot. Using Connie’s Fitbit and analyzing her movements, analysts were able to create a timeline that proved Richard had created a false story.[35]
On March 5, 2017, Kelly Herron[36] was using a public bathroom, when a man, who had been convicted of previous sex crimes, attempted to rape Herron. Herron fought her way out of the crime and the story became widely circulated because her Fitbit had tracked her frantic movements during her escape.
On March 10, 2015, Jeannine M. Risley fabricated a story[37] in which an intruder appeared in her employer’s home she was staying at and raped her. Risley told police that a man had assaulted her around midnight. Police found a Fitbit lying on the floor when they arrived at the scene. Prosecutors used the Fitbit as evidence and data to determine what had occurred. The Fitbit revealed that Risley was active throughout the night, and the Fitbit surveillance analysis demonstrated Risley had not gone to bed like she stated to the police; therefore, proving Risley had lied to the police.
See also[edit]

Jawbone
Key finder
Microsoft Band
Misfit (company)
Quantified Self
Smart keychain
Smartwatch
Garmin

References[edit]


^ "Fitbit Company Profile". CrunchBase. TechCrunch. Retrieved 2009-09-17. 
^ Ewalt, David M. (2010-06-11). "Getting Fitbit". Forbes. Retrieved 2017-03-29. 
^ a b c Jakicic, JM; Davis, KK; Rogers, RJ; King, WC; Marcus, MD; Helsel, D; Rickman, AD; Wahed, AS; Belle, SH (September 20, 2016). "Effect of Wearable Technology Combined With a Lifestyle Intervention on Long-term Weight Loss: The IDEA Randomized Clinical Trial". JAMA. 316 (11): 1161–1171. ISSN 0098-7484. PMID 27654602. doi:10.1001/jama.2016.12858. Among young adults with a BMI between 25 and less than 40, the addition of a wearable technology device to a standard behavioral intervention resulted in less weight loss over 24 months. Devices that monitor and provide feedback on physical activity may not offer an advantage over standard behavioral weight loss approaches. 
^ Bell, Karissa. "Fitbit Updates App With Exercise and Run-Tracking Features". 
^ Graziano, Dan (January 5, 2017). "Fitbit's new software update makes your tracker more personal". 
^ Eysenbach, Gunther. "The Impact of a Web-Based App (eBalance) in Promoting Healthy Lifestyles: Randomized Controlled Trial". J Med Internet Res. 17: e56. PMC 4376125 . PMID 25732936. doi:10.2196/jmir.3682. 
^ Ridgers, ND; McNarry, MA; Mackintosh, KA (November 23, 2016). "Feasibility and Effectiveness of Using Wearable Activity Trackers in Youth: A Systematic Review.". JMIR mHealth and uHealth. 4 (4): e129. PMC 5143467 . PMID 27881359. doi:10.2196/mhealth.6540. 
^ "Does your fitness band really work? Scientists analyse tracking tech". Retrieved 2015-09-10. 
^ Diaz, Keith M.; Krupka, David J.; Chang, Melinda J.; Peacock, James; Ma, Yao; Goldsmith, Jeff; Schwartz, Joseph E.; Davidson, Karina W. "Fitbit®: An accurate and reliable device for wireless physical activity tracking". International Journal of Cardiology. 185: 138–140. PMC 4406840 . PMID 25795203. doi:10.1016/j.ijcard.2015.03.038. 
^ CEO letter 2/20/14. February 20, 2014.
^ a b "Fitbit Recalls Force Activity-Tracking Wristband Due to Risk of Skin Irritation". U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission. March 12, 2014. The firm has received about 9,900 reports of the wristband causing skin irritation and about 250 reports of blistering. 
^ Allen, Karma (April 29, 2017). "Fitbit says woman's tracker didn't explode on its own". ABC News. 
^ Baig, Edward C. (April 25, 2017). "Fitbit says it's investigating report of exploding Flex 2". USA Today. 
^ Hadi, Mohammed (May 7, 2015). "Fitbit Files for IPO, to Seek NYSE Listing". Bloomberg News. Retrieved 2015-05-10. 
^ Chris Ciaccia (June 2, 2015). "Fitbit Updates IPO Pricing". TheStreet. 
^ Jhonsa, Eric (May 7, 2015). "Fitbit files for IPO, reports strong growth/profits". Retrieved 2015-05-10. 
^ Ananya Bhattacharya (June 18, 2015). "Fitbit stock surges nearly 50%". Retrieved 2015-12-20. 
^ Stevenson, Abigail (October 6, 2016). "Fitbit CEO reveals he’s transforming the mission and purpose of the company". Retrieved 2016-10-06 – via CNBC. 
^ "Fitbit, Inc. Acquires Assets from Pebble". fitbit.com. Fitbit. December 7, 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-08. 
^ "Pebble’s Next Step". getpebble.com. December 7, 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-08. 
^ Butcher, Mike (January 11, 2017). "Fitbit acquires the Vector smart watch startup, as the wearable giant continues its roll-up". TechCrunch. Retrieved January 11, 2017. 
^ Niu, Evan (February 23, 2017). "Fitbit Paid $38 Million for Its 2 Smartwatch Acquisitions". TheMotleyFool. Retrieved April 5, 2017. 
^ "Yammer Takes Top Prize At TechCrunch50". TechCrunch. AOL. 
^ "CES Innovation Awards". International CES. 
^ Fast Company. “The Most Innovative Companies of 2016.” February 19, 2016. March 30, 2016.
^ "Terms Of Service” Creating an Account, February 9, 2017.
^ a b "Fitbit Blog". Fitbit Blog. 
^ Jack Loftus. "Dear Fitbit Users, Kudos On the 30 Minutes of "Vigorous Sexual Activity" Last Night". Gizmodo. Gawker Media. 
^ "Police: Woman’s fitness watch disproved rape report". ABC27. June 19, 2015. 
^ "Fitbit data just undermined a woman’s rape claim". Fusion. June 29, 2015. 
^ "When Fitbit Is the Expert Witness". The Atlantic. November 19, 2014. 
^ David Glance (November 24, 2014). "How your Fitbit data can and will be used against you in a court of law". The Conversation. 
^ AP (April 28, 2017). "Man pleads not guilty in murder case using Fitbit evidence". The Associated Press. 
^ Schwedel, Heather (April 26, 2017). "How a Fitbit Helped Solve a Murder Case". Slate. ISSN 1091-2339. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 
^ Watts, Amanda. "Cops use murdered woman's Fitbit to charge her husband". CNN. Retrieved 19 June 2017. 
^ Narins, Elizabeth (March 13, 2017). "This Jogger Fought Off a Mid-Run Assault and Her Fitness Tracker Captured the Entire Thing". Cosmopolitan. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 
^ Gershman, Jacob (April 21, 2016). "Prosecutors Say Fitbit Device Exposed Fibbing in Rape Case". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Fitbit.



Official website





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fitbit&oldid=790130721"					
Categories: American companies established in 2007Android (operating system) softwareCompanies established in 2007Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeElectronics companies established in 2007Electronics companies of the United StatesIOS softwareManufacturing companies based in San FranciscoManufacturing companies established in 2007Technology companies based in the San Francisco Bay AreaUniversal Windows Platform apps2015 initial public offeringsHidden categories: Use mdy dates from January 2017 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


EestiFrançaisItalianoРусскийSuomiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 July 2017, at 20:03.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Fitbit - Wikipedia





















 






Fitbit

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Fitbit Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: FIT


Industry
Consumer electronics


Founded
San Francisco, California, United States (May 1, 2007 (2007-05-01))[1]


Founders
James Park
Eric Friedman


Headquarters
San Francisco, California, United States



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

James Park (CEO)
Eric Friedman (CTO)


Products
Fitbit Tracker


Subsidiaries
Pebble


Website
www.fitbit.com


Fitbit (NYSE: FIT) is an American company headquartered in San Francisco, California, known for its products of the same name, which are activity trackers, wireless-enabled wearable technology devices that measure data such as the number of steps walked, heart rate, quality of sleep, steps climbed, and other personal metrics involved in fitness. The first product released was the Fitbit Tracker.[2] Some evidence has found that the use of similar devices results in less weight loss rather than more.[3]



Contents


1 Products

1.1 Health effects
1.2 Accuracy
1.3 Recall


2 History
3 Reception

3.1 Awards
3.2 Privacy concerns
3.3 Surveillance


4 See also
5 References
6 External links



Products[edit]
Main article: List of Fitbit products




The Fitbit Flex, with the functioning unit out of the replaceable wristband.


Alongside the activity trackers, Fitbit offers a website and mobile app for iOS, Android and Windows 10 Mobile.[4] The trackers can be synced to smart devices via Bluetooth or uploaded to a computer running Windows or macOS using the Bluetooth USB dongle. Users have the ability to log their food, activities, and weight, to track over time and can set daily and weekly goals for themselves for steps, calories burned and consumed, and distance walked. Calories in versus calories out is more accurately measured when app users keep their tracker on. However, the app can be used without a tracker to measure calories on a lifestyle app. The app offers a community page where users can challenge themselves and compete against other users. The social element anticipates an increase in motivation, finding that users take an average of 700 more steps per day when they have friends on the app.[5] Users can choose to share their progress pictures and achievement badges.
Health effects[edit]
In those who are overweight or obese, a 2016 study indicates that the use of wearable technology combined with standard behavioral weight loss intervention results in less weight loss after two years of use when compared to usual weight loss interventions.[3] There was no evidence that the devices altered the amount that people exercised or their diet compared to control.[3] A 2015 study found use of lifestyle apps demonstrate promising results in promoting healthy living in adults.[6] It is unclear whether these devices affect the amount of physical activity children engage in.[7]
Accuracy[edit]
A small 2014 study of eight fit band devices during a 69-minute workouts that included 13 different activities found the bands were at best "reasonably accurate", with the Fitbit Zip and Fitbit One scoring 10.1% and 10.4% error ratings, respectively.[8]
A small 2015 study had participants wear multiple devices on their wrists and hips performing different walking/running speeds on a treadmill. Fitbit devices worn on the hip accurately measured steps taken within 1 step of 100% accuracy. Devices worn on the wrist, however, were off by an average of 11 steps per minute. When measuring the number of calories burned, Fitbit devices worn on the hip underestimated by an average of 6%, while devices worn on the wrist overestimated calories burned by 21%. Authors concluded that both the Fitbit One and Fitbit Flex devices reliably measured step counts and energy expenditure, with hip-based Fitbit devices being more accurate than wrist-based devices.[9] These measurements did not address the question of health effects.
Recall[edit]
Fitbit, working with the Consumer Protection Safety Commission, recalled the Fitbit Force on February 20, 2014 because some users experienced allergic reactions to the materials used in the product.[10] On March 12, 2014 the Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC) made the recall official.[11] At that time it was revealed that There were 9,900 reports of skin irritation and 250 reports of blistering .[11] The product is no longer for sale on Fitbit's website.
In April 2017, a woman claimed her Fitbit Flex 2 malfunctioned and caught on fire, causing second-degree burns on her arm.[12] Following an investigation, Fitbit is adamant the cause of the exploding tracker was due to external forces, assuring their customers they are not aware of any other complaints and they can confidently wear their own Fitbit with no concerns.[13]
History[edit]
Headquartered in San Francisco, California, Fitbit was founded on May 1, 2007 by James Park (CEO) and Eric Friedman (CTO). On May 7, 2015, Fitbit announced it had filed for IPO with a NYSE listing.[14] The IPO was filed for $358 million.[15] The company's stock began trading with the symbol "FIT"[16] on June 18, 2015.[17] After Fitbit's stocks fell more than 50% in 2016, CEO James Park announced in October that the company was undergoing a major transformation from what he called a "consumer electronics company" to a "digital healthcare company."[18]
On December 7, 2016, Fitbit officially announced that they acquired assets from Pebble, including key personnel, as the company decided to stop producing wearable technology. The acquisition excludes Pebble's hardware products.[19][20]
In January 2017, Fitbit acquired Romania-based smartwatch startup Vector Watch SRL for $15 million and it also paid $23 million for Pebble, a smartwatch brand that started as a Kickstarter campaign.[21][22]
Reception[edit]




Dedicated Fitbit retail stand stocked with different Fitbit Flex trackers


Awards[edit]
Fitbit has won numerous awards, including runner-up at TechCrunch50 in 2008[23] and CES 2009 Innovation honoree and best in the Health & Wellness category.[24] In 2016, Fitbit ranked 37 out of the 50 most innovative companies for that year.[25]
Privacy concerns[edit]
To set up and use the hardware, one has to create an account with Fitbit and agree to data collection, transfer and privacy rules.[26]
Starting in June 2011, Fitbit was criticized for its website's default activity-sharing settings, which made users' manually-entered physical activities available for public viewing.[27] All users had the option to make their physical activity information private, but some users were unaware that the information was public by default. One specific issue, which technology blogs made fun of, was that some users were including details about their sex lives in their daily exercise logs, and this information was, by default, publicly available.[28] Fitbit responded to criticism by making all such data private by default and requesting that search engines remove indexed user profile pages from their databases.[27]
The company's devices have also been used in criminal investigations; in one instance, a rape claim against an unnamed intruder was turned around to a criminal charge for false reports based on data from the claimant's Fitbit.[29][30][31][32][33]
Surveillance[edit]
A Fitbit played a role in solving a murder.[34] Connie Dabate was murdered by her husband Richard Dabate. Initially, Richard framed the situation, telling police and law enforcement officials that an intruder had broken into their home and fatally shot his wife. However, Connie’s Fitbit tracker showed that she was at the gym at the time Richard told police his wife was shot. Using Connie’s Fitbit and analyzing her movements, analysts were able to create a timeline that proved Richard had created a false story.[35]
On March 5, 2017, Kelly Herron[36] was using a public bathroom, when a man, who had been convicted of previous sex crimes, attempted to rape Herron. Herron fought her way out of the crime and the story became widely circulated because her Fitbit had tracked her frantic movements during her escape.
On March 10, 2015, Jeannine M. Risley fabricated a story[37] in which an intruder appeared in her employer’s home she was staying at and raped her. Risley told police that a man had assaulted her around midnight. Police found a Fitbit lying on the floor when they arrived at the scene. Prosecutors used the Fitbit as evidence and data to determine what had occurred. The Fitbit revealed that Risley was active throughout the night, and the Fitbit surveillance analysis demonstrated Risley had not gone to bed like she stated to the police; therefore, proving Risley had lied to the police.
See also[edit]

Jawbone
Key finder
Microsoft Band
Misfit (company)
Quantified Self
Smart keychain
Smartwatch
Garmin

References[edit]


^ "Fitbit Company Profile". CrunchBase. TechCrunch. Retrieved 2009-09-17. 
^ Ewalt, David M. (2010-06-11). "Getting Fitbit". Forbes. Retrieved 2017-03-29. 
^ a b c Jakicic, JM; Davis, KK; Rogers, RJ; King, WC; Marcus, MD; Helsel, D; Rickman, AD; Wahed, AS; Belle, SH (September 20, 2016). "Effect of Wearable Technology Combined With a Lifestyle Intervention on Long-term Weight Loss: The IDEA Randomized Clinical Trial". JAMA. 316 (11): 1161–1171. ISSN 0098-7484. PMID 27654602. doi:10.1001/jama.2016.12858. Among young adults with a BMI between 25 and less than 40, the addition of a wearable technology device to a standard behavioral intervention resulted in less weight loss over 24 months. Devices that monitor and provide feedback on physical activity may not offer an advantage over standard behavioral weight loss approaches. 
^ Bell, Karissa. "Fitbit Updates App With Exercise and Run-Tracking Features". 
^ Graziano, Dan (January 5, 2017). "Fitbit's new software update makes your tracker more personal". 
^ Eysenbach, Gunther. "The Impact of a Web-Based App (eBalance) in Promoting Healthy Lifestyles: Randomized Controlled Trial". J Med Internet Res. 17: e56. PMC 4376125 . PMID 25732936. doi:10.2196/jmir.3682. 
^ Ridgers, ND; McNarry, MA; Mackintosh, KA (November 23, 2016). "Feasibility and Effectiveness of Using Wearable Activity Trackers in Youth: A Systematic Review.". JMIR mHealth and uHealth. 4 (4): e129. PMC 5143467 . PMID 27881359. doi:10.2196/mhealth.6540. 
^ "Does your fitness band really work? Scientists analyse tracking tech". Retrieved 2015-09-10. 
^ Diaz, Keith M.; Krupka, David J.; Chang, Melinda J.; Peacock, James; Ma, Yao; Goldsmith, Jeff; Schwartz, Joseph E.; Davidson, Karina W. "Fitbit®: An accurate and reliable device for wireless physical activity tracking". International Journal of Cardiology. 185: 138–140. PMC 4406840 . PMID 25795203. doi:10.1016/j.ijcard.2015.03.038. 
^ CEO letter 2/20/14. February 20, 2014.
^ a b "Fitbit Recalls Force Activity-Tracking Wristband Due to Risk of Skin Irritation". U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission. March 12, 2014. The firm has received about 9,900 reports of the wristband causing skin irritation and about 250 reports of blistering. 
^ Allen, Karma (April 29, 2017). "Fitbit says woman's tracker didn't explode on its own". ABC News. 
^ Baig, Edward C. (April 25, 2017). "Fitbit says it's investigating report of exploding Flex 2". USA Today. 
^ Hadi, Mohammed (May 7, 2015). "Fitbit Files for IPO, to Seek NYSE Listing". Bloomberg News. Retrieved 2015-05-10. 
^ Chris Ciaccia (June 2, 2015). "Fitbit Updates IPO Pricing". TheStreet. 
^ Jhonsa, Eric (May 7, 2015). "Fitbit files for IPO, reports strong growth/profits". Retrieved 2015-05-10. 
^ Ananya Bhattacharya (June 18, 2015). "Fitbit stock surges nearly 50%". Retrieved 2015-12-20. 
^ Stevenson, Abigail (October 6, 2016). "Fitbit CEO reveals he’s transforming the mission and purpose of the company". Retrieved 2016-10-06 – via CNBC. 
^ "Fitbit, Inc. Acquires Assets from Pebble". fitbit.com. Fitbit. December 7, 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-08. 
^ "Pebble’s Next Step". getpebble.com. December 7, 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-08. 
^ Butcher, Mike (January 11, 2017). "Fitbit acquires the Vector smart watch startup, as the wearable giant continues its roll-up". TechCrunch. Retrieved January 11, 2017. 
^ Niu, Evan (February 23, 2017). "Fitbit Paid $38 Million for Its 2 Smartwatch Acquisitions". TheMotleyFool. Retrieved April 5, 2017. 
^ "Yammer Takes Top Prize At TechCrunch50". TechCrunch. AOL. 
^ "CES Innovation Awards". International CES. 
^ Fast Company. “The Most Innovative Companies of 2016.” February 19, 2016. March 30, 2016.
^ "Terms Of Service” Creating an Account, February 9, 2017.
^ a b "Fitbit Blog". Fitbit Blog. 
^ Jack Loftus. "Dear Fitbit Users, Kudos On the 30 Minutes of "Vigorous Sexual Activity" Last Night". Gizmodo. Gawker Media. 
^ "Police: Woman’s fitness watch disproved rape report". ABC27. June 19, 2015. 
^ "Fitbit data just undermined a woman’s rape claim". Fusion. June 29, 2015. 
^ "When Fitbit Is the Expert Witness". The Atlantic. November 19, 2014. 
^ David Glance (November 24, 2014). "How your Fitbit data can and will be used against you in a court of law". The Conversation. 
^ AP (April 28, 2017). "Man pleads not guilty in murder case using Fitbit evidence". The Associated Press. 
^ Schwedel, Heather (April 26, 2017). "How a Fitbit Helped Solve a Murder Case". Slate. ISSN 1091-2339. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 
^ Watts, Amanda. "Cops use murdered woman's Fitbit to charge her husband". CNN. Retrieved 19 June 2017. 
^ Narins, Elizabeth (March 13, 2017). "This Jogger Fought Off a Mid-Run Assault and Her Fitness Tracker Captured the Entire Thing". Cosmopolitan. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 
^ Gershman, Jacob (April 21, 2016). "Prosecutors Say Fitbit Device Exposed Fibbing in Rape Case". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Fitbit.



Official website





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fitbit&oldid=790130721"					
Categories: American companies established in 2007Android (operating system) softwareCompanies established in 2007Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeElectronics companies established in 2007Electronics companies of the United StatesIOS softwareManufacturing companies based in San FranciscoManufacturing companies established in 2007Technology companies based in the San Francisco Bay AreaUniversal Windows Platform apps2015 initial public offeringsHidden categories: Use mdy dates from January 2017 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


EestiFrançaisItalianoРусскийSuomiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 July 2017, at 20:03.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Mobile Accessory Reviews - CNET











Pioneer's Lightning-powered mini speaker is weird but kind of cool
The Rayz Rally, a tiny batteryless, business-grade speakerphone, plugs into your iPhone or iPad and is ready for duty.
by David Carnoy

1:23 



Close




Drag



Autoplay: ON
Autoplay: OFF














CNET
Mobile
Mobile Accessories
Products
Mobile Accessory Reviews
 



 







Price








Less than $6 




$6 - $10 




$10 - $15 




$15 - $20 




$20 - $25 




$25 - $35 




$35 - $75 




More than $75 



$
to $
Apply




Product Type








phone battery




cellular phone battery




battery




Battery pack




Camera battery




Mobile Accessories: Product Type


camcorder battery




emergency charger




Game console battery




power adapter




power adapter - car




digital player / phone charging stand + power adapter - car




external battery pack




power adapter - AC / USB




power adapter and battery charger




power adapter - car / USB




cellular phone charging pad




power adapter - AC / car / USB




phone charging stand + power adapter




phone charging stand / battery charger




wireless charging mat / external battery pack




battery and charger




charging stand




wireless charging mat




wireless charging mat receiver + external battery pack




GPS receiver charging stand - car




external battery pack + power adapter - AC + power adapter - car




wireless charging stand




GPS receiver battery




Battery charger




phone charging stand




wireless charging stand - car




battery charger adapter




digital player / phone / tablet charging station




power adapter + battery charger




power adapter - AC + power adapter - car




tablet charge and sync station




wireless charging receiver




battery charger - car




power bank




solar charger




battery charger - AC / car / USB




phone / smart watch charging stand




external battery pack - AC / car




power pack




external battery pack - solar




DC splitter




charging stand / battery charger




external battery pack + battery charger




wireless charging mat - car




power bank / power adapter




phone / tablet charging station




power supply




battery charger - car / USB




Wireless game controller charging stand + power adapter




tablet charging station




battery pack charging stand + power bank




two-way radio / cellular phone battery




Digital AV Player / Recorder battery




Radio battery




Two-way radio battery




battery backup




smart watch / phone / tablet charging station



Apply Filters
Cancel





See more





Manufacturer








Belkin




BlackBerry




Lenovo




Mace Group - Macally




Motorola




Mobile Accessories: Manufacturer


Samsung




Sony




Targus




IncipioDirect.com




Otter




ACCO Brands




Apple




Adesso, Inc.




Case Logic




Asus




Krusell




Dell, Inc.




HP




Inland Products




Panasonic




Toshiba




Global Marketing Partners




Philips




ViewSonic




AMZER




Archos




Brenthaven




Built NY, Inc.




CODi




Case-mate




Disruptive




Ergotech




Griffin Technology Inc.




Hard Candy




Hard Candy Cases




Imation Enterprises




Incase Designs




Link Depot Corp.




M-edge Accessories




Macsense Connectivity




Marware




Moshi




Octa




Ozaki




Small Dog Electronics




Speck Products




SwitchEasy Limited




Tucano




V7 Videoseven




Xtreme Accessories, LLC.  (XtremeMac)




ZAGG Inc.




ifrogz




jWIN Electronics




Golla




iSkin Inc.




3M




ACECAD, A Subsidiary of Solid Year Group




ATEN Technology




AudioOutfitters, LLC




Blueant Wireless




BoxWave Corporation




Casio Inc.




Covertec




Datalogic




Fellowes Manufacturing




Franklin Covey




Fujitsu




HTC




Hip Street




Honeywell, Inc.




IBM




Informatics, Inc.




LXE




Lenntek




Logitech




Matias Corporation




Microsoft




Monaco Cases




Motion Computing, Inc.




Palm




Psion Teklogix (a subsidiary of Psion PLC)




ROTA America




SIIG Inc.




Sakar International, Inc




Socket Communications




Sumdex, Inc.




Texas Instruments Inc.




UTStarcom




Unitech Electronics




Wasp Bar Code




Zebra Technologies




goTenna




iGo, Inc.




dreamGEAR/iSound




SOLO




Franklin Electronic Publishers




Garmin




Tripp Lite




TomTom




Digital Innovations




General Electric




The Joy Factory




Verbatim Corp.




AAMP of America




AFC Trident




ALS Industries




APC




Accessory Power




AccessoryGeeks.com




AccessoryGenie.com




Acme Made




Activision




Adobe




Adonit




Aduro Products, LLC




Advantus Corp




Agent 18




AlertLine Communications Inc.




Alpine Electronics




Aluratek, Inc.




Amazon




American Covers, Inc.




American DJ




American International




Amplivox Sound Systems




Amstron Corporation




Arkon Resources, Inc




Arri Group




Atari




Atlantic Technology




Atlantic, Inc.




Audio-Technica




Audiovox Corporation




Avenues In Leather




Axis Communications




BDA




Bazooka Mobile Audio




Behringer




Bensussen, Deutsch & Associates




BigBen Interactive




Bluelounge Design




Bluesmart




Body Glove




Bogen Photo Corp.




Bose Corp.




Bracketron, Inc.




Brady Corporation




Broan-NuTone LLC




Brother International




C2G




CNet Technology Inc.




CP Technologies




CTA Digital




Califone International Inc.




Canon




Carved




Caseable




Celestron




Cell Pig




CellRanger




Cellet Products




Channel Vision




Chief Sanus Audio Visual




Cisco




Clearwire




Cobra Electronics




Cocoon




Cocoon Innovations




Cokin




ConnecteDevice Ltd




Contour Design




Creative




Cricket




Crosley Radio




Crumpler




CyberPower




DBtechnologies




Da-Lite Screen Company, Inc




Dantona Industries, Inc.




Datel Design & Development Ltd




DayDeal.com




DeLorme Mapping Co.




Deflect-O




Denon




DiCAPac




Digital Concepts




Digital Lifestyle Outfitters




Digital Products International




Directed Electronics Inc.




Dolica Corporation




Draper Inc




Duracell Inc.




ECBC




Eichhof Holding AG Ltd. (Datacolor)




Electro Source, LLC




Elinca




Empire Interactive




EnGenius Tech Inc.




EnerPlex




Energizer




Enustech. Inc.




Epson




Eton Corporation




Ewa-marine




Falcon Safety Products




Flash Ventures




Fluke




Freedom Input Ltd




Fujifilm




Funkwerk Americas Inc




Furman Sound, Inc.




GBC




Gamer Graffix




Gator Cases




Gecko Gear Australia




Gefen




GelaSkins Inc.




Generic




Gepe Produkte AG




Gilsson Technologies




Gitzo




Google




Gossen




Great Stuff




H20 Audio




HOSA Technology, Inc.




Hakuba Photo Industry Co., Ltd.,




Hama GmbH & Co KG




Hardigg Industries, Inc.




Harman




Hawking Technologies




Hi-Capacity




Higher Ground Gear




HoMedics




Hori




Humminbird




ION Audio




IdeaStream Consumer Products, LLC.




Ingenico




Ingram




Init




Intec




IntelliTouch Communications




Intelligent Energy




Interwork Technologies Inc.




Intuitive Motion Inc.,




JVC




Jabra




Jack of All Games




Jelco, Inc.




Just Wireless




KOBO, Inc.




KONNET Technology Inc




Keen Shoes




Kenu




Kinamax




Kodak




Koss Corp.




Kroo




Kyocera




LEE Filters




LG




Lowepro




Lastolite




Lenmar Enterprises Inc.




Leviton




LifeProof




Lightware




Linear Corporation




Livescribe, Inc.




Logbar Inc.




Lomo




Lowel




Minimal




MMF Industries




MOIXA ENERGY LTD




MTV




Mace Pro Security Products




Mad Catz




Made Products Inc.




Magellan




Mamiya America Corporation




Manfrotto




Maxell




McKlein




Meade Instruments Corp.




Mediis Technologies LTD




Merkury Innovations




Metra Electronics Corporation




Metz-Werke GmbH & Co. KG




Michelin Group




Michley Electronics, Inc.




Midland Consumer Radio




Mitsubishi




Mizco International




Mobile Edge




Monoprice




Monster




Mophie




MusicSkins




NAVIGON, Inc.




NEC Corporation




Nady Systems Inc.




Naki International




National Geographic




National Products Inc.




Naztech Wireless Technologies




NetGear




Nikon Inc.




Niles Audio Corp.




Nintendo




Nite Ize, Inc.




Nokia




Norazza, Inc.




North American Battery Company




Novatel Wireless Inc.




Nvidia




Nyko Technologies




OP/TECH USA




Offspring Technologies




Ogio




Olympus




Optech USA




PC Treasures, Inc.




PM Company




Pacific Accessory Corporation




Pad & Quill




PanaVise Products, Inc.




Panamax




Pandigital




Parrot Company




Peerless Industries




Pelican Accessories




Pelican Products




Performance Designed Products, LLC




Pioneer




Pocket Solutions, Inc.




PointMobl




Polycom Inc.




PortaBrace, Inc.




Power Acoustik Electronics




Psyclone Competition Grade




Pyle Audio




QDOS




QSC Audio Products, Inc.




QVS




Qmadix




RCA




RadioShack




React Accessories




Rivet International




Rocketfish




Rotatrim




Rubbermaid




Russound




SIGMA




SKB Industrial




SLD Marketing Group LLC




STM




Sabrent Co., Ltd.




Safco




Saitek




Salamander Designs Ltd.




Salom America Company




Samsonite Corp USA




Scosche Industries, Inc.




Seek Thermal




Sennheiser




Sentry Industries, Inc.




Sharp




Shinybow Technology Co., Ltd.




Shuttle Computer, Inc.




Sima Products




Simgo Mobile ltd.




Simplism




Skooba Design




Skque




Skullcandy




Slappa




Slik Corporation




Sonostar, Inc.




Sony Ericsson




SpeakerCraft




Spectra Merchandising International




Sportline




StarTech




Steren Electronics




StreetWires




SuperTooth




Switch Easy




T-Mobile




TYLT




Tackform Technology




Tamrac, Inc.




Tamron USA, Inc




Technocel




TekNmotion




TeknoCreations Inc.




Tely Labs




Tenba




The Tiffen Company




ThermaPAK Technologies




Thermaltake Technology Inc.




Timbuk2




ToCAD America Inc.




Tom Bihn




TrackR




Tune Belt




Twig




Typo Products




UNITED STATIONERS




USA Spec




Urban Factory




VALCOM INC




Vaja Corp.




Valor Multimedia




ValuSoft




Vanguard (USA), Inc.




Vantage Point Products Corp.




Vector Networks, Inc.




Ventev Innovations




Verge




Verizon Wireless




Vidis GmbH




Vidpro Corporation




Viking Components Inc.




Voxred International LLC




WESTCOTT




Wacom Technology Corp.




Wagan




Walt Disney Co.




Wenger N.A.




WiLife




Wilson Electronics




Wingspan Investment Partners I, LLC




Wireless Xcessories Group




Xentris LLC.




Yamaha




Zeikos Inc.




dexim Santom




eMotion, Inc.




eReplacements




everki




ezGear




i.Tech Dynamic Limited




iOgrapher LLC




iWatchz




Aquapac International Limited




Novoflex




Cables Unlimited




JAVOedge.com




NLU Incorporated




Outpac Designs Ltd.




Boss Audio Systems




Spigen




Fugoo




Photographic Research Organization (Promaster)




iClever




Barska




Brunton




Cygnett




Eachine




Emerge Technologies, Inc.




Kanex




Lepow




MetroMile Inc.




SPECTRALINK CORP




Tech21




Sprint




Arista Interactive LLC




TREXTA




Anymode




CM4




Callpod, Inc.




Pantech & Curitel




Seidio, Inc.




Sena Cases




Skech




aevoe Inc.




zCover Inc.




Mattel Inc.




Musubo




Battery-Biz Inc.




CMO America




Digital Blue




Anchor Audio Inc.




ClearOne Communications




DEDOTEC USA, Inc.




Fender




JTL Corp.




Kowa Company, Ltd.,




Marshall Electronics Inc.




Odyssey Systems, Inc.




Samson Technologies Corp.




Twelve South LLC.




ASSA ABLOY




MTX Audio




National Products




Ballistic




JL Audio Inc.




MARATHON




Allsop, Inc.




Patriot Memory




Accell




Hitcase




Leica Camera, Inc.




Gear Head




IK Multimedia Production




Flir




Bling my Thing




Gumdrop Cases




Infernal Innovations




MiPow




Conair




4XEM Corporation




Cirago International Ltd.




Rane Corporation




Shure Inc.




Smith-Victor Corp.




Vivitar




AT&T




Ergotron Inc




Team ProMark




G-Form




Smead Manufacturing




Grace Digital Inc.




HornetTek




Manhattan Associates




Master Lock Company




Odoyo




Rokform




SDI Technologies Inc.




Sonim




Splash




Superior Communications




Topeak




idox




Greenlee Textron




Quirky




Tech | 21




Thule




ZTYLUS




foneGEAR




Anker




Teledex Inc.




Just Mobile




Acer




Greatshield




Aleratec, Inc




Avaya




Battery Technology Inc. (BTI)




Bretford Manufacturing Inc




Elgato Systems, LLC




I/OMagic Corporation




IOGear




Original Power




Premiertek




Rosewill Inc.




XPal Power




Onkyo




PhoneSuit




StudioPhonic




VSN Mobil




EasyAcc




ProProductsonline.com




Teleway Industrial




Gemini Sound Products Corp.




Techlink International




B&W International




Traveler's Choice




Tension Labs, Inc.




Ten One Design LLC




Bury Technologies




Celltronix




Huawei Technologies Co., Ltd.




RooCase




GPS Outfitters




ModeLabs




Pivothead




ProtecT Keyboard Covers




Intel




MightySkins




Cole Haan




E-Motion




I-Blason




OmegaBrandess




Brando Workshop




Eagle Tech Computers, Inc.




KYE Systems America Corporation




Powermat




Satechi




Tumi




Telex Computer Audio Products




BLU Products




Ematic




fitBAG




Osomount




TESSCO Technologies Incorporated




Fonesalesman Ltd




iOttie, Inc.




olloclip




Empire Scientific




Photoflex Products Inc




Seal Shield




Richard Solo




Chimera Lighting




Photogenic Professional Lighting




Steiner Optik




Tele Vue Optics, Inc.




Wireless Extenders Inc.




Cellphone-Mate, Inc.




Fostex America




iPWR




thinkTANK Photo




Schneider Electric




Mass Fidelity




CipherLab




MagTek




Phottix




iBolt




Bron Elektronik AG




Kate Spade




Lazy-Hands




Advanced Wireless Solutions LLC




Kmashi




Skinomi




iKross




Centon Electronics




SolPro




The Music People!




New Potato Technologies




Rain Design Inc




Nike




Clip-A-Phone




Uniden America Corp.




VariZoom Lens Controls




VTech Holdings




Comprehensive Video Group




Hoffco Brands




Best Buy




Lowrance Electronics, Inc.




Exelium




ACE CAD Enterprise




VisionTek Inc.




Native Union




Braven




Xantrex Technology




GrandTec USA




ZTE




EMTEC, Inc.




SplitFish GameWare




Audioengine Corp.




Amped Wireless




Vantec Inc.




Infinite Technologies




Sonos, Inc.




Penpower




Polaroid Corp.




TEAC America Inc.




Fanny Wang Headphone Company




Syba Tech




id America




Sena Technologies




The KATA Group




Adorama Camera, Inc




Alesis




Atlas Sound




Blue Microphones




Breffo




ChicBlvd Inc.




Cooler Master




Custom Brackets




DJI




Dewalt




Emporia




Fitbit Inc.




Fusion Electronics Limited




INOITULOS S.L.




Ikelite Underwater Systems




International Parkside Products




KIRK telecom




Keyspan




Kinetronics Corporation




Klipsch




Lexerd




Mavizen Limited




Meridrew Enterprises




Miccus, Inc.




Netatmo




Nextivity




Read-Rite




Sirius XM Radio




Spotwave Wireless Inc




Swissvoice




The Buzz Killers




TrafficGauge, Inc.




Veho




iCleaner




iGrip




Insten




WildCharge, Inc




Revolve Electronics, Inc.




Snom Technology




Cokem International Ltd.




Martian Watches




Nomad Goods




Proporta Ltd




Shoulderpod




Technuity, Inc.




Quantum Instruments, Inc.




Wireless One




Cyber Acoustics, LLC




Numark Industries LLC




Third Rail Mobility, LLC




Kenneth Cole




Nikura




The Padcaster LLC




Compucessory




Rand McNally




YourWirelessSource




Voxx International




Xantech Corporation




Fuel3D




Tile, Inc.




Hitachi




IClooly




Konftel




LeapFrog




First International Digital




Oakley, Inc.




Witti




Trianium




Peak Design




M-Audio




Shaxon Industries




Burris




Yuneec




Romoss




WrapSol




KB Covers




Avantronics




Bolt Power




WakaWaka




Digital Peripheral Solutions




Victor Hasselblad AB




Cross Pen Computing Group




X-Doria




Beats by Dre




Plantronics




Ampergen




Core Gamer Inc.




Fossil, Inc.




Perm-A-Store, Inc.




Skybell




Vocopro




Axiom Memory Solutions




In Focus Systems, Inc.




JOBY Inc.




Handspring




Native Instruments USA




Newer Technology




Westone Laboratories, Inc.




3Com Direct




Stacked Powered, LLC




Excalibur Electronics




Polyconcept USA




ARCAM




Bell'O International




EHang




FLIR Systems




PNY Technologies Inc.




ROLI




Rockford Corporation




Telefunken




Tether Tools




Under Armour




iPhoneck




Anycom, Inc.




Cambridge Audio




Discwasher




Pacific Design, Ltd.




Polk Audio, Inc.




SI5.COM




Spec Tools




Staples




Chauvet Lighting




Key Digital




Monarch Education & Computer Furniture




Presonus Audio Electronics, Inc.




iRiver




Aurora Multimedia




Carl ZEISS




Carson Optical




Dane Electronics




Joytech




Lectrosonics, Inc.




Lexar Media Inc.




Lumedyne, Inc




Maha Energy Corporation




Matthews Studio Equipment




Peavey Electronics Corporation




Primera Technology




Ultimate Support Systems




Vextra Technologies, LLC




Wintec




Revolabs




WizDex Corp




Bravoview Technology




Clarion




LaCie Ltd.




Chipolo




Invoxia




Kaito Electronics




Merge VR




Pixie Technology




Plume Labs




i-BLADES




Bellus3D




Datavideo USA




Sekonic Professional Division (Mamiya America Corporation)




VIXEN CO., LTD.




Milante




V-Moda




American Tourister




humantoolz




3Dconnexion




Grundorf Corporation




PENN ELCOM INC




Ted Baker




VISION




NetScout




A.T. Cross Company




Denaq




Emporia Telecom




Michael Kors




Sanyo




VuPoint Solutions




White Diamonds




Universal Remote Control, Inc.




Shortcut Labs




Zerotech




Acme




Ricoh




Riva Case




M & S Systems




ORTOFON INC.




Sanho




Ampy




Zolt




Cardo Systems, Inc.




Janam Technologies




Sling Media




Apogee Electronics Corporation




Logic3




i2 electronics




American Microsystems, Ltd.




Gamber-Johnson




General Dynamics Itronix




Hobbico




Integral Office Comunicaciones




Interworks Unlimited




JK Audio




JLab Audio, Inc.




Speco Technologies




Swarovski Optik




Yuasa Battery, Inc.




iDeaUSA




Cyber Clean




SRS Labs, Inc.




Catterpillar Inc




Bower Incorperated




Mujjo




Stebco LLC




Supersonic, Inc.




Wahoo Fitness




Audio Power Industries




EK Ekcessories




Ergoguys




Fusion Computer




Premier




Athena Technologies




Honeywell Imaging and Mobility




Slacker, Inc.




Cowon Systems, Inc.




DigiCom Digital




Gomadic Corp.




Key Tronic Corp.




Knoll Systems




Lava Computer MFG Inc.




Lensbabies, LLC




M-ROCK




Pentax




Roland Corporation




Total Micro Technologies




Victory




Welch Allyn Inc.




XGearlive




Aiptek Inc




American Recorder Technologies




Antec Inc.




Arsenal Gaming




BatMax Corporation




BenQ America Corp.




Beyond Cell International




Blockhead




CRU-DataPort




Case It




Coolmax Technology, Inc.




CradlePoint, Inc.




Craig Electronics




Cremax USA Corporation




Datamation Systems, Inc.




Dicota GmbH




Dr. Bott LLC




Elite Screens Inc.




Flexiglow




Hoodman Corporation




IDAmerica




IOmounts




InVision Software




Innergie




Lifeworks




Lorex Technology




Lucent Technologies




Nonda




PODSTA




Pantone, Inc.




Pharos Science & Applications Inc.




Polaris Software




Random House




Rayovac Corporation




Smartparts




Soundstream Technologies Corp.




SwitchEasy




Symantec




The House of Marley




Thuraya Satellite Telecommunications Company




Uncommon




UpBeat Audio, Inc.




XSories




ZeroChroma LLC




lexibook




Advanced Bridging Technologies, Inc.




Ascendeo




Atdec Pty Ltd




Avaya Inc.




Barnes & Noble




BoomerangIt, Inc.




Brodit




CD3 Storage Systems




CableWholesale




ClearSounds




CompanionLink Software




Delphi Corp.




Dice Electronics




Digitech (A Harman International Company)




Digium, Inc.




EarHugger, Inc.




Elago




Elmo Integrated Systems




Fiberlok




Forward Industries




Fosnom




Furuno Electric Co., Ltd.




GIZMON




Gateway




Grado Labs Inc.




Graphsim Entertainment




HUBBELL INC -CL A




Hali-Power




InnoPocket




Intermec




Jivo Technology




Kenwood




Kinyo Company Inc.




LifeView Inc.




Lind Electronics, Inc.




Micro Accessories




Micro Innovation Computers




Micro Innovations




MicroSpareParts




Mitel, Inc.




NewTrent Inc.




Nexpak




Nextar




Nextel Communications Inc.




NoviiMedia




Optoma




Pentel Of America Ltd




Performance Technologies




Phoenix Gold




Pico Macom




Piel




Power Support USA




Powercam Inc.




Proficient Audio Systems




Qualcomm Inc.




Radio Shack




SMARTHOME.COM




SOL Republic




Saunders Mfg. Co. Inc.




Sonnet Technologies, Inc.




Super Micro Computer Inc.




Symbol Technologies




THB Bury




TRIMBLE NAVIGATION LTD




Tech Data Corp




The Betesh Group (Motion Systems)




Vivitar Corp.




Vizio




Voyager Systems




Voyetra Turtle Beach




Westinghouse




X10 Wireless Technology Inc.




Z-Line Designs




Zenith Electronics Corporation




Aukey




Compact Power Systems




Guillemot Corp.




Nixon USA




Paris Business Products




Powertraveller




Preco New Products Corp.




Radica Games LTD




iBIZ Technology Corp.



Apply Filters
Cancel





See more









  





1 – 18 of 20,372

 Sort by:














$99.95
at Apple






                Pioneer Rayz Rally
                            

Although it should be a lot cheaper, the Rayz Rally is handy little plug-and-play speaker that significantly upgrades the audio of your iPhone.






$80.00
MSRP






                Moto GamePad
                            

The Moto GamePad brings full game controls to the Moto Z with one magnetic snap.






$999.00
MSRP






                SlingStudio
                            

The company's first livestreaming appliance can gather video wirelessly from multiple phones and cameras while you multicam switch, edit and stream.










                Samsung DeX Dock
                            

Get a desktop view of Android apps, complete with Bluetooth mouse and keyboard support.



 









                Samsung Gear VR Controller
                            

Here's how Samsung's mobile VR controller looks and feels.










                Bellus3D Face Camera
                            

A new camera from Bellus scans your face in high resolution with crazy detail, making you the next Dolores or Teddy.










                Chipolo Item Tracker
                            

Chipolo claims its new Bluetooth item trackers are the thinnest and loudest on the market.



 





$130.00
MSRP






                i-Blades Elite Smartcase
                            

The Elite Smartcase and Smartblade adds extra power and memory to your Galaxy S6 or S7.










                Holo Cube
                            

A little foam block that looks like Hellraiser's puzzle box, but it's actually quite charming.






$49.99
MSRP






                Pixie
                            

Pixie uses a mesh network to act like local GPS for lost items. We can't wait to plaster these all over our possessions.










                Plume Labs Flow
                            

Flow from Plume Labs tracks air quality to give you real-time data for limiting your exposure to air pollution.










$19.99
MSRP






                Shortcut Labs FlicSingle Smart Button
                            

For the price of $20, the FlicLights Smart Button is a great entry point for users wanting an easier way to control their smart LEDs.



 





$99.99
MSRP






                Valet Charger Power Pack 6700 mAh for Apple Watch + iPhone
                            

Belkin's got another Valet dual charging accessory for iPhones and Apple Watches, but this one's a portable.






$179.95
at Apple






                ROLI Blocks
                            

A light grid on a touch-sensitive square is an entire music-creation system. Blocks is easy to learn, even if you never played an instrument before.






$179.00
MSRP






                goTenna Mesh
                            

Whether you're embarking on a camping trip, filling a go-bag for emergency prep or traveling anywhere without a reliable cellular connection, the GoTenna Mesh is a nimble solution for off-the-grid messaging.










$20.59
at Amazon Marketplace






                Logitech Bluetooth Music Receiver
                            

Forget the aux cord -- this Logitech Bluetooth Music Receiver is the easiest way to stream audio from your smartphone or laptop.






$59.99
at Jet.com






                Wacom Bamboo smart notepads
                            

The Wacom Bamboo Slate and Bamboo Folio provide a practical bridge between handwritten notes on paper and making them available in the cloud.










$239.00
at Amazon.com






                Hasselblad True Zoom Moto Mod
                            

If you take a lot of photos and have a Motorola Moto Z phone, the Hasselblad is a great add-on to have, as long as you're looking for a big zoom instead of better-than-phone photo quality.





 Prev
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
...
1132
Next 












 Related                            Deals                and                Promotions

 All                            Deals


Gravity X Smartphone Car Mount for $20 + $2 s&h
$20.00

Gravity X Smartphone Car Mount for $20 + $2 s&h





iPhone 6, 6s Wallet Case, Durable and Slim, Lightweight with Classic Design & Ultra-Strong Magnetic Closure , Faux Leather
$16.14

iPhone 6, 6s Wallet Case, Durable and Slim, Lightweight with Classic Design & Ultra-Strong Magnetic Closure , Faux Leather





Splashsound Shower Speaker - Waterproof Bluetooth Shower Speaker with Suction Cup, Hanging Clip and Micro SD Card Slot – Clear 5W Audio Output
$8.99

Splashsound Shower Speaker - Waterproof Bluetooth Shower Speaker with Suction Cup, Hanging Clip and Micro SD Card Slot – Clear 5W Audio Output






 

iPhone 7 Screen Protector & Case Combo, Allovit 2-Pack Tempered Glass Screen Protector and Crystal Clear Case, Dual Layer Protection Cover for iPhone 7 4.7"
$7.49

iPhone 7 Screen Protector & Case Combo, Allovit 2-Pack Tempered Glass Screen Protector and Crystal Clear Case, Dual Layer Protection Cover for iPhone 7 4.7"





Google Pixel XL Case, YOUMAKER Full-body Rugged Belt Clip Holster Case with Built-in Screen Protector for Google Pixel 5.5 inch (2016 Release)
$12.74

Google Pixel XL Case, YOUMAKER Full-body Rugged Belt Clip Holster Case with Built-in Screen Protector for Google Pixel 5.5 inch (2016 Release)





Samsung Gear VR Headset for $30 + free shipping
$30.00

code: DNSAM15
Samsung Gear VR Headset for $30 + free shipping






 


 


 


 


 







 






Fitbit - Wikipedia





















 






Fitbit

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Fitbit Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: FIT


Industry
Consumer electronics


Founded
San Francisco, California, United States (May 1, 2007 (2007-05-01))[1]


Founders
James Park
Eric Friedman


Headquarters
San Francisco, California, United States



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

James Park (CEO)
Eric Friedman (CTO)


Products
Fitbit Tracker


Subsidiaries
Pebble


Website
www.fitbit.com


Fitbit (NYSE: FIT) is an American company headquartered in San Francisco, California, known for its products of the same name, which are activity trackers, wireless-enabled wearable technology devices that measure data such as the number of steps walked, heart rate, quality of sleep, steps climbed, and other personal metrics involved in fitness. The first product released was the Fitbit Tracker.[2] Some evidence has found that the use of similar devices results in less weight loss rather than more.[3]



Contents


1 Products

1.1 Health effects
1.2 Accuracy
1.3 Recall


2 History
3 Reception

3.1 Awards
3.2 Privacy concerns
3.3 Surveillance


4 See also
5 References
6 External links



Products[edit]
Main article: List of Fitbit products




The Fitbit Flex, with the functioning unit out of the replaceable wristband.


Alongside the activity trackers, Fitbit offers a website and mobile app for iOS, Android and Windows 10 Mobile.[4] The trackers can be synced to smart devices via Bluetooth or uploaded to a computer running Windows or macOS using the Bluetooth USB dongle. Users have the ability to log their food, activities, and weight, to track over time and can set daily and weekly goals for themselves for steps, calories burned and consumed, and distance walked. Calories in versus calories out is more accurately measured when app users keep their tracker on. However, the app can be used without a tracker to measure calories on a lifestyle app. The app offers a community page where users can challenge themselves and compete against other users. The social element anticipates an increase in motivation, finding that users take an average of 700 more steps per day when they have friends on the app.[5] Users can choose to share their progress pictures and achievement badges.
Health effects[edit]
In those who are overweight or obese, a 2016 study indicates that the use of wearable technology combined with standard behavioral weight loss intervention results in less weight loss after two years of use when compared to usual weight loss interventions.[3] There was no evidence that the devices altered the amount that people exercised or their diet compared to control.[3] A 2015 study found use of lifestyle apps demonstrate promising results in promoting healthy living in adults.[6] It is unclear whether these devices affect the amount of physical activity children engage in.[7]
Accuracy[edit]
A small 2014 study of eight fit band devices during a 69-minute workouts that included 13 different activities found the bands were at best "reasonably accurate", with the Fitbit Zip and Fitbit One scoring 10.1% and 10.4% error ratings, respectively.[8]
A small 2015 study had participants wear multiple devices on their wrists and hips performing different walking/running speeds on a treadmill. Fitbit devices worn on the hip accurately measured steps taken within 1 step of 100% accuracy. Devices worn on the wrist, however, were off by an average of 11 steps per minute. When measuring the number of calories burned, Fitbit devices worn on the hip underestimated by an average of 6%, while devices worn on the wrist overestimated calories burned by 21%. Authors concluded that both the Fitbit One and Fitbit Flex devices reliably measured step counts and energy expenditure, with hip-based Fitbit devices being more accurate than wrist-based devices.[9] These measurements did not address the question of health effects.
Recall[edit]
Fitbit, working with the Consumer Protection Safety Commission, recalled the Fitbit Force on February 20, 2014 because some users experienced allergic reactions to the materials used in the product.[10] On March 12, 2014 the Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC) made the recall official.[11] At that time it was revealed that There were 9,900 reports of skin irritation and 250 reports of blistering .[11] The product is no longer for sale on Fitbit's website.
In April 2017, a woman claimed her Fitbit Flex 2 malfunctioned and caught on fire, causing second-degree burns on her arm.[12] Following an investigation, Fitbit is adamant the cause of the exploding tracker was due to external forces, assuring their customers they are not aware of any other complaints and they can confidently wear their own Fitbit with no concerns.[13]
History[edit]
Headquartered in San Francisco, California, Fitbit was founded on May 1, 2007 by James Park (CEO) and Eric Friedman (CTO). On May 7, 2015, Fitbit announced it had filed for IPO with a NYSE listing.[14] The IPO was filed for $358 million.[15] The company's stock began trading with the symbol "FIT"[16] on June 18, 2015.[17] After Fitbit's stocks fell more than 50% in 2016, CEO James Park announced in October that the company was undergoing a major transformation from what he called a "consumer electronics company" to a "digital healthcare company."[18]
On December 7, 2016, Fitbit officially announced that they acquired assets from Pebble, including key personnel, as the company decided to stop producing wearable technology. The acquisition excludes Pebble's hardware products.[19][20]
In January 2017, Fitbit acquired Romania-based smartwatch startup Vector Watch SRL for $15 million and it also paid $23 million for Pebble, a smartwatch brand that started as a Kickstarter campaign.[21][22]
Reception[edit]




Dedicated Fitbit retail stand stocked with different Fitbit Flex trackers


Awards[edit]
Fitbit has won numerous awards, including runner-up at TechCrunch50 in 2008[23] and CES 2009 Innovation honoree and best in the Health & Wellness category.[24] In 2016, Fitbit ranked 37 out of the 50 most innovative companies for that year.[25]
Privacy concerns[edit]
To set up and use the hardware, one has to create an account with Fitbit and agree to data collection, transfer and privacy rules.[26]
Starting in June 2011, Fitbit was criticized for its website's default activity-sharing settings, which made users' manually-entered physical activities available for public viewing.[27] All users had the option to make their physical activity information private, but some users were unaware that the information was public by default. One specific issue, which technology blogs made fun of, was that some users were including details about their sex lives in their daily exercise logs, and this information was, by default, publicly available.[28] Fitbit responded to criticism by making all such data private by default and requesting that search engines remove indexed user profile pages from their databases.[27]
The company's devices have also been used in criminal investigations; in one instance, a rape claim against an unnamed intruder was turned around to a criminal charge for false reports based on data from the claimant's Fitbit.[29][30][31][32][33]
Surveillance[edit]
A Fitbit played a role in solving a murder.[34] Connie Dabate was murdered by her husband Richard Dabate. Initially, Richard framed the situation, telling police and law enforcement officials that an intruder had broken into their home and fatally shot his wife. However, Connie’s Fitbit tracker showed that she was at the gym at the time Richard told police his wife was shot. Using Connie’s Fitbit and analyzing her movements, analysts were able to create a timeline that proved Richard had created a false story.[35]
On March 5, 2017, Kelly Herron[36] was using a public bathroom, when a man, who had been convicted of previous sex crimes, attempted to rape Herron. Herron fought her way out of the crime and the story became widely circulated because her Fitbit had tracked her frantic movements during her escape.
On March 10, 2015, Jeannine M. Risley fabricated a story[37] in which an intruder appeared in her employer’s home she was staying at and raped her. Risley told police that a man had assaulted her around midnight. Police found a Fitbit lying on the floor when they arrived at the scene. Prosecutors used the Fitbit as evidence and data to determine what had occurred. The Fitbit revealed that Risley was active throughout the night, and the Fitbit surveillance analysis demonstrated Risley had not gone to bed like she stated to the police; therefore, proving Risley had lied to the police.
See also[edit]

Jawbone
Key finder
Microsoft Band
Misfit (company)
Quantified Self
Smart keychain
Smartwatch
Garmin

References[edit]


^ "Fitbit Company Profile". CrunchBase. TechCrunch. Retrieved 2009-09-17. 
^ Ewalt, David M. (2010-06-11). "Getting Fitbit". Forbes. Retrieved 2017-03-29. 
^ a b c Jakicic, JM; Davis, KK; Rogers, RJ; King, WC; Marcus, MD; Helsel, D; Rickman, AD; Wahed, AS; Belle, SH (September 20, 2016). "Effect of Wearable Technology Combined With a Lifestyle Intervention on Long-term Weight Loss: The IDEA Randomized Clinical Trial". JAMA. 316 (11): 1161–1171. ISSN 0098-7484. PMID 27654602. doi:10.1001/jama.2016.12858. Among young adults with a BMI between 25 and less than 40, the addition of a wearable technology device to a standard behavioral intervention resulted in less weight loss over 24 months. Devices that monitor and provide feedback on physical activity may not offer an advantage over standard behavioral weight loss approaches. 
^ Bell, Karissa. "Fitbit Updates App With Exercise and Run-Tracking Features". 
^ Graziano, Dan (January 5, 2017). "Fitbit's new software update makes your tracker more personal". 
^ Eysenbach, Gunther. "The Impact of a Web-Based App (eBalance) in Promoting Healthy Lifestyles: Randomized Controlled Trial". J Med Internet Res. 17: e56. PMC 4376125 . PMID 25732936. doi:10.2196/jmir.3682. 
^ Ridgers, ND; McNarry, MA; Mackintosh, KA (November 23, 2016). "Feasibility and Effectiveness of Using Wearable Activity Trackers in Youth: A Systematic Review.". JMIR mHealth and uHealth. 4 (4): e129. PMC 5143467 . PMID 27881359. doi:10.2196/mhealth.6540. 
^ "Does your fitness band really work? Scientists analyse tracking tech". Retrieved 2015-09-10. 
^ Diaz, Keith M.; Krupka, David J.; Chang, Melinda J.; Peacock, James; Ma, Yao; Goldsmith, Jeff; Schwartz, Joseph E.; Davidson, Karina W. "Fitbit®: An accurate and reliable device for wireless physical activity tracking". International Journal of Cardiology. 185: 138–140. PMC 4406840 . PMID 25795203. doi:10.1016/j.ijcard.2015.03.038. 
^ CEO letter 2/20/14. February 20, 2014.
^ a b "Fitbit Recalls Force Activity-Tracking Wristband Due to Risk of Skin Irritation". U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission. March 12, 2014. The firm has received about 9,900 reports of the wristband causing skin irritation and about 250 reports of blistering. 
^ Allen, Karma (April 29, 2017). "Fitbit says woman's tracker didn't explode on its own". ABC News. 
^ Baig, Edward C. (April 25, 2017). "Fitbit says it's investigating report of exploding Flex 2". USA Today. 
^ Hadi, Mohammed (May 7, 2015). "Fitbit Files for IPO, to Seek NYSE Listing". Bloomberg News. Retrieved 2015-05-10. 
^ Chris Ciaccia (June 2, 2015). "Fitbit Updates IPO Pricing". TheStreet. 
^ Jhonsa, Eric (May 7, 2015). "Fitbit files for IPO, reports strong growth/profits". Retrieved 2015-05-10. 
^ Ananya Bhattacharya (June 18, 2015). "Fitbit stock surges nearly 50%". Retrieved 2015-12-20. 
^ Stevenson, Abigail (October 6, 2016). "Fitbit CEO reveals he’s transforming the mission and purpose of the company". Retrieved 2016-10-06 – via CNBC. 
^ "Fitbit, Inc. Acquires Assets from Pebble". fitbit.com. Fitbit. December 7, 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-08. 
^ "Pebble’s Next Step". getpebble.com. December 7, 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-08. 
^ Butcher, Mike (January 11, 2017). "Fitbit acquires the Vector smart watch startup, as the wearable giant continues its roll-up". TechCrunch. Retrieved January 11, 2017. 
^ Niu, Evan (February 23, 2017). "Fitbit Paid $38 Million for Its 2 Smartwatch Acquisitions". TheMotleyFool. Retrieved April 5, 2017. 
^ "Yammer Takes Top Prize At TechCrunch50". TechCrunch. AOL. 
^ "CES Innovation Awards". International CES. 
^ Fast Company. “The Most Innovative Companies of 2016.” February 19, 2016. March 30, 2016.
^ "Terms Of Service” Creating an Account, February 9, 2017.
^ a b "Fitbit Blog". Fitbit Blog. 
^ Jack Loftus. "Dear Fitbit Users, Kudos On the 30 Minutes of "Vigorous Sexual Activity" Last Night". Gizmodo. Gawker Media. 
^ "Police: Woman’s fitness watch disproved rape report". ABC27. June 19, 2015. 
^ "Fitbit data just undermined a woman’s rape claim". Fusion. June 29, 2015. 
^ "When Fitbit Is the Expert Witness". The Atlantic. November 19, 2014. 
^ David Glance (November 24, 2014). "How your Fitbit data can and will be used against you in a court of law". The Conversation. 
^ AP (April 28, 2017). "Man pleads not guilty in murder case using Fitbit evidence". The Associated Press. 
^ Schwedel, Heather (April 26, 2017). "How a Fitbit Helped Solve a Murder Case". Slate. ISSN 1091-2339. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 
^ Watts, Amanda. "Cops use murdered woman's Fitbit to charge her husband". CNN. Retrieved 19 June 2017. 
^ Narins, Elizabeth (March 13, 2017). "This Jogger Fought Off a Mid-Run Assault and Her Fitness Tracker Captured the Entire Thing". Cosmopolitan. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 
^ Gershman, Jacob (April 21, 2016). "Prosecutors Say Fitbit Device Exposed Fibbing in Rape Case". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Fitbit.



Official website





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fitbit&oldid=790130721"					
Categories: American companies established in 2007Android (operating system) softwareCompanies established in 2007Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeElectronics companies established in 2007Electronics companies of the United StatesIOS softwareManufacturing companies based in San FranciscoManufacturing companies established in 2007Technology companies based in the San Francisco Bay AreaUniversal Windows Platform apps2015 initial public offeringsHidden categories: Use mdy dates from January 2017 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


EestiFrançaisItalianoРусскийSuomiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 July 2017, at 20:03.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Fitbit Inc (FIT) Stock Has a Huge Flaw - Its Products | InvestorPlace







































































 


























































Menu 






 Stocks to Buy
Stocks to Sell
Dividend Stocks
Penny Stocks
Hot Stocks
Stock Market Today
 






DOW-



NASDAQ-



S&P
					500-

















Real estate IPO Redfin soars 36% on its market debut >>> READ MORE

Breaking news sponsored by




























Home > Stock Picks > Stocks to Sell >  









	Fitbit Inc (FIT) Stock Has a Huge Flaw – Its Products
Despite heavy expenditures,, Fitbit can't make a compelling product to save its life

By Tom Taulli, InvestorPlace Writer & IPO Playbook Editor  |  Apr 25, 2017, 12:29 pm EDT



 
  View All  





















 


Popular Posts:
Advanced Micro Devices, Inc. (AMD) Is an Innovation MachineFacebook Inc (FB) Stock Still Is a Growthy Buy After Q2 Beat3 Reasons Nvidia Corporation (NVDA) Stock Still Has a Solid Bullish Case
Recent Posts:

The Fatal Flaw of Fitbit Inc (FIT) Stock
A Buyout Is Still In the Cards for Sprint Corp (S) Stock
Facebook Inc (FB) Stock Still Is a Growthy Buy After Q2 Beat


						View All Posts
					








In the 10-K for Fitbit Inc (NYSE:FIT), the company notes: “We believe our future success depends on our ability to develop new products and features that expand the versatility and performance of our existing platform and we plan to continue to invest significant resources to enhance performance, functionality, and convenience and style for our users.”
Source:  Via Fitbit

This is certainly very true. But there’s a problem: FIT has failed miserably to execute on the vision. The fact is that there has been a breakdown of the product development process.
And this should be downright scary for holders of Fitbit stock. Wall Street investors and short sellers have mercilessly pounded the shares over the past year. FIT stock is off about 88% since the peak.
The irony is that the company has poured substantial resources in its R&D efforts. From 2014 to 2016, spending spiked from $54.2 million to $320.2 million.
But as seen with the performance last year, FIT hasn’t put this money to effective use. During the holiday quarter, the company saw its revenues plunge a grueling 19% to $573.8 million and the number of devices sold went from 8.2 million to 6.5 million. FIT also reported its first net loss as a public company.
This came despite the fact that it launched four new devices. But unfortunately, they really did not show much improvement in functionality and innovation. In the meantime, there has been a rush of competition to the market. Just some of the fierce rivals include Apple Inc. (NASDAQ:AAPL), Garmin Ltd. (NASDAQ:GRMN), Samsung Electronics (OTCMKTS:SSNLF), Xiaomi and Microsoft Corporation (NASDAQ:MSFT).
There are also plenty of low-cost operators, which rely on the pervasive Android system from Alphabet Inc (NASDAQ:GOOGL,NASDAQ:GOOG).
In light of all this, is it any wonder that Fitbit stock has gotten crushed? Of course not.
What Now For Fitbit Stock?
For the most part, the problems with product development are far from over. According to a report from Yahoo Finance, the FIT smartwatch as well as the Bluetooth headphones are expected to be delayed until the fall.
Some of the issues include complications with the GPS system and water resistance. Granted, the engineering of small devices is no easy feat. But let’s face it, GPS has been around for a long time. So with all the technical talent at FIT, why is this a problem?
Next Page

  1 2 View All View All  



Article printed from InvestorPlace Media, http://investorplace.com/2017/04/fitbit-inc-fit-stock-has-a-huge-flaw-product-development/.
©2017 InvestorPlace Media, LLC









More on InvestorPlace





Top 10 ETFs Money Can Buy





Chevron Stands Tall After Q2 Earnings





Amazon Stock Shows a Hint of Weakness





Exxon Mobil Stock Can’t Find Its Legs After Earnings Miss





3 Hot Semiconductor Stocks, 3 Time Bombs





7 ‘Millennial’ Stocks to Buy at Any Age





 














 



ADVERTISEMENT 
 



ADVERTISEMENT 


Editor's Picks





									The Top 10 ETFs Money Can Buy								






									4 Red-Hot Stocks (And 3 That Aren’t)								






									7 ‘Millennial’ Stocks to Buy No Matter What Age You Are								






									3 Hot Semiconductor Stocks, 3 Time Bombs								






									My 3 Favorite Vanguard ETFs								




 

					Most Popular
				



5 Stocks to Sell for AugustThe Top 10 ETFs Money Can BuyAmazon.com, Inc. (AMZN) vs Alphabet Inc (GOOGL) – The Best 10-Year Bet7 All-Weather Stocks to Buy for the Next 30 Years7 High-Yield ETFs for Aggressive Income Investors10 ‘Cheap’ Stocks to Buy That Are Actually Cheap 



Poll of the Day




View and vote in our How confident are you about the U.S. economy under President Donald Trump? poll


Partners 


























 



ADVERTISEMENT 
 












































Richard Band
John Jagerson
Hilary Kramer
Jon Markman
Louis Navellier
Bryan Perry
Ken Trester
Dan Wiener
Richard Young


Blue Chip Growth
Cash Machine
GameChangers
Independent Adviser for Vanguard Investors
Intelligence Report
Maximum Options
Profitable Investing
SlingShot Trader
Trader’s Advantage


Active Trading
Income Investing
Growth Investing
Mutual Funds & ETFs
Value Hunters
Options Trading













            About Fitbit
        









































        Fitbit
        




Products


Fitness Wristbands and Clips




Fitbit Zip®





Fitbit One®





Fitbit Flex 2™





Fitbit Alta™





Heart Rate + Fitness Wristbands




Fitbit Alta HR™
New





Fitbit Charge 2™





Smart Fitness Watches




Fitbit Blaze™





Smart Scale




Fitbit® Aria®









FITBIT ACCESSORIES








Designer
Collections






Not sure which product is right for you? FIND YOUR FIT




Why Fitbit

Why Fitbit
What's New
Our Technology
FitScience
About Us



Get Motivated

Fitstar
Events
Blog
FitForGood
Fitbit Premium



App & Dashboard

App Tour
Fitbit Challenges
Compatible Apps



Help

Product Help
Forums
Wear & Care
How-To Videos








Your cart is currently empty. Let's shop



                                                Store
                                            






                                            Log in
                                        



                                            Setup
                                        

















Who We Are
We're a passionate team dedicated to health and fitness who are building products that help transform people's lives. While health can be serious business, we feel it doesn't have to be. We believe you're more likely to reach your goals if you're encouraged to have fun, smile, and feel empowered along the way.





An Idea was Born
In 2007, our founders, Eric and James, realized that sensors and wireless technology had advanced to a point where they could bring amazing experiences to fitness and health. They embarked on a journey to create a wearable product that would change the way we move.











Our Mission
To empower and inspire you to live a healthier, more active life. We design products and experiences that fit seamlessly into your life so you can achieve your health and fitness goals, whatever they may be.







Meet our team






James Park
CEO, President & Co-Founder







James Park
CEO, President & Co-Founder
James is our Co-Founder and has served as our Chairman since May 2015, as a member of our board of directors since March 2007, and as our President and CEO since September 2007. Previously, James served as a Director of Product Development at CNET Networks, as the President and a Co-Founder of Wind-Up Labs, Inc. (an online photo-sharing company acquired by CNET Networks in April 2005). He was also CTO and Co-Founder of Epesi Technologies, Inc., a software company. James attended Harvard College where he studied Computer Science. He was selected to serve as a member of our board of directors due to the perspective and experience he brings as our Co-Founder, President, and CEO.








Eric N. Friedman
Chief Technology Officer & Co-Founder







Eric N. Friedman
Chief Technology Officer & Co-Founder
Eric is our Co-Founder and has served as a member of our board of directors since March 2007, and most recently as our CTO. Previously, Eric served as an Engineer Manager at CNET Networks, as a Co-Founder of Wind-Up Labs, a founding engineer of Epesi Technologies, and a technical member of the Real-Time Collaboration Group at Microsoft Corporation. Eric holds a B.S. and M.S. in Computer Science from Yale University. He was selected to serve as a member of our board of directors due to the perspective and experience he brings as our Co-Founder and CTO.








William Zerella
Chief Financial Officer







William Zerella
Chief Financial Officer
William has served as our CFO since June 2014. From October 2011 to June 2014, he served as Chief Financial Officer of Vocera Communications, Inc., a wireless healthcare communications company which he took public in 2012. Prior to Vocera, William served as CFO for Force10 Networks (a networking company acquired by Dell Inc), as CFO at Infinera Corporation (a telecom equipment provider), and CFO at Calient Networks (an optical equipment provider). He also held several senior level financial and business management positions at GTECH Corporation and Deloitte & Touche. He holds a B.S. in Accounting from the New York Institute of Technology and an M.B.A. from the Leonard N. Stern School of Business at NYU.








Amy McDonough
VP & GM, Fitbit Group Health







Amy McDonough
VP & GM, Fitbit Group Health
Amy is responsible for Fitbit Wellness, working with employers and strategic partners in the corporate wellness space. She focuses on empowering organizations to run more effective and engaging wellness programs with Fitbit's world-class technologies & services. Prior to Fitbit, Amy held several strategic roles at CNET Networks, including the Director of Audience and Content Development for the Community Division and Director of Strategic Partnerships for the Network. Amy has a bachelor’s degree from Merrimack College in Andover, MA, and a Professional Certificate in Integrated Marketing Communications from the UC Berkeley Extension program. Amy used to run marathons, but today she gets her steps by chasing her two young boys around. They keep her busy enough to walk the equivalent of one full circle around the earth.








Tim Rosa
Chief Marketing Officer







Tim Rosa
Chief Marketing Officer
As CMO of Fitbit, Tim is responsible for brand & product marketing, partnerships, advertising & media, PR & events, Fitbit.com, premium services, CRM, customer acquisition, engagement and monetization. Most recently, Tim was VP of Global Brand Development at Electronic Arts, where he led branding for FIFA, Madden, Battlefield and Need for Speed, among others. Prior to EA, Tim was the VP of Marketing at DivX, a digital video pioneer, leading the company into acquisition. He also led marketing efforts for the famed video game publisher 2K Sports, and increased NBA 2K market share from 10% to 80% in five years. Tim attended the University of Michigan-Flint and lives in Mill Valley, where he spends his "play time” surfing, playing ice hockey, mountain biking and trail running on Mt. Tam.








Lindsay Cook
VP, Product Marketing







Lindsay Cook
VP, Product Marketing
As VP of Product Marketing at Fitbit, Lindsay is responsible for leading product marketing, international marketing, marketing research and consumer insights, as well as the development and execution of new product launches. Prior to Fitbit, she held brand marketing positions at Clorox in their Home Care and Brita businesses, where she launched the Brita Bottle—one of the most successful new products in the company’s history. Lindsay started her career at Microsoft, leading marketing campaigns and product management for the Windows Embedded family of products. She holds a BAA from University of Michigan and an MBA from Harvard Business School. She currently lives in San Francisco, where she spends her free time traveling and hiking with her husband and girls.








Miko Gellerman
VP, Business Planning and Analysis







Miko Gellerman
VP, Business Planning and Analysis
Miko is our VP of Business Planning and Analysis, focusing on leading agile planning processes and analyses to support global sales and marketing. She has 20 years of experience in building businesses, strategies and new corporate capabilities. Prior to Fitbit, Miko led Strategy and Business Planning at LeapFrog, where she pioneered smart connected device experiences in the toy space and built their Consumer Analytics and Lifecycle Marketing teams. Before that, she was a management consultant with KSA, and led partnership development for FTVentures (a private equity firm) and Brodia (a consumer tech startup). Miko holds a B.A. from Connecticut College and an M.B.A. from Harvard Business School. She currently lives in Berkeley and spends her free time around Bay Area soccer fields or the slopes of Squaw Valley rooting for her boys.








Andy Missan
EVP, General Counsel & Secretary







Andy Missan
EVP, General Counsel & Secretary
Andy Missan has served as our EVP and General Counsel since October 2015 and prior to that served as our VP and General Counsel from March 2013. From 2009 to 2012, Andy served as VP and General Counsel at Bytemobile, Inc., a mobile video optimization company. Prior to Bytemobile, he served as VP and General Counsel of MobiTV (a provider of mobile video solutions), VP and General Counsel of Danger (a mobile devices and services company), and VP and General Counsel of Replay TV (a DVR technology company). He also held senior legal and business affairs positions at RCA Records Label/BMG Entertainment and Sony Music Entertainment. Andy earned a B.A. in Government from Oberlin College and a J.D. from Northwestern University School of Law.








Ron Kisling
Chief Accounting Officer







Ron Kisling
Chief Accounting Officer
Ron is currently our Chief Accounting Officer. Before joining Fitbit, he served as CFO of Nanometrics, and as both VP of Finance and CFO of PGP Corporation (a data encryption and security software company) until its acquisition by Symantec in 2010. For the eight years prior, Ron held CFO positions at Portal Software and SPL WorldGroup, both acquired by Oracle Corp., as well as Saba Software. And before that, he held a variety of finance and accounting positions at Symantec and Coopers and Lybrand. He holds a Bachelor's degree in Economics from Stanford University.








Anu Bedi
VP, Global Tax







Anu Bedi
VP, Global Tax
Anu has over 30 years of experience in Tax, with particular emphasis on International Tax. Before joining Fitbit, she led the global tax function at Rovi, an entertainment technology company. Prior to that, she spent 13 years at Logitech, building and leading Worldwide Tax while the company grew from $400 Million to more than $2 Billion. Anu holds an M.B.A. in International Finance from Thunderbird School of Global Management. She is currently on the Board of the Santa Clara chapter of Tax Executive Institute and is a member of the Silicon Valley Tax Directors Group.








Kristina Omari
VP, Corporate Development







Kristina Omari
VP, Corporate Development
Kristina leads Corporate Development at Fitbit. She brings more than 20 years of experience in corporate development, investment banking and strategy to the company. Before joining Fitbit, Kristina was Vice President of Corporate Development (M&A) for Adobe Systems Inc., where she led a team that oversaw $3+ billion in transactions and focused on inorganic growth, equity investments, M&A execution and post-merger integration. Prior to Adobe, Kristina held positions with Lehman Brothers in Technology Investment Banking and with Hewlett Packard in Strategy & Corporate Development. Kristina holds a B.S. in Industrial Engineering from Stanford University and an MBA from the Stanford Graduate School of Business.








Jonah Becker
VP, Industrial Design







Jonah Becker
VP, Industrial Design
Jonah leads our industrial design team, creating breakthrough health and fitness products. He has 20 years of experience using design to build brands in the consumer electronics and sporting goods industries. Before joining Fitbit, Jonah was a partner at One & Co, a design agency that delivered award-winning products for brands like Nike, Microsoft, Burton Snowboards, Dell and Kodak. In 2008, One & Co was acquired by HTC where Jonah became VP of Industrial Design and was responsible for the smartphone product lines, future vision projects, and expansion into new categories. Jonah has a B.A. in Philosophy from UC Berkeley and a B.F.A. in Industrial Design from California College of the Arts, where he is a senior lecturer in the design program. When Jonah isn't thinking about design, you'll likely find him trail running, riding a bike or playing soccer with his kids.








Jen Ralls
VP, Communications







Jen Ralls
VP, Communications
As head of communications at Fitbit, Jen is responsible for global communications and public relations, including the company’s public relations strategy, events, ambassador programs and corporate and employee communications. Before joining Fitbit in 2013, Jen was Senior Director of Marketing Communications at THX Ltd. Prior to THX, she led all corporate communications and public relations at Pioneer Electronics. She brings 20 years of experience to the company and has held positions both in-house and at top public relations agencies where she worked closely with consumer tech brands such as HP, Pixar, Planar, Visa, and VTech. Jen earned a bachelor’s degree in English Literature from Princeton University. Jen lives and breathes the Fitbit brand and is an avid recreational hiker, runner, yogi, paddler, surfer, skier and cook. She currently resides in Marin County, CA with her husband, two kids and two dogs.








Jay Kershner
VP, Customer Support







Jay Kershner
VP, Customer Support
Jay leads our Customer Support and Field Testing teams with a mission to delight customers by quickly providing solutions through the channel of their choice. Prior to Fitbit, Jay spent over 16 years managing customer service teams and building world-class support organizations at TiVo, Dash Navigation and Zynga. His first career was in the restaurant industry, managing restaurants in San Francisco and the Peninsula. Jay holds a B.S. in Hotel, Restaurant and Travel Administration from the University of Massachusetts, Amherst. When he’s not working or spending time with his family and three dogs, Jay likes to play basketball and put his Fitbit through the paces at Tough Mudder races. He wears shorts 300 days a year.








Dave Quong
VP, Finance







Dave Quong
VP, Finance
Dave over 20 years of finance experience to his role as Fitbit’s VP of Finance. He has worked at a variety of high-tech and financial services companies, and was most recently the VP of Finance at Aruba Networks, an enterprise wireless company. Before that, Dave led the finance organization at Netgear, a wireless, storage and security company. In his five years at the company, Netgear grew from a $450 million company to $1.2 billion company. Dave holds a B.S. in Economics from UC Berkeley.








Steve Morley
VP & GM, APAC







Steve Morley
VP & GM, APAC
Steve leads our Sales and Marketing organizations in Asia Pacific, and has more than 20 years of experience in VP and Director positions as both a supplier and retailer across Asia Pacific. He established Kodak’s Digital Division in APAC during the industry’s digital transformation, and led large vertical retail businesses for Goodyear and Vodafone. His telecoms experience also includes the build, launch and scaling of one of the region’s first Mobile Virtual Networks. Currently, Steve is busy creating a leadership position for our brand in 10 major Asia Pacific countries. When he's not getting his steps in Asia’s airports, Steve keeps his Fitbit leaderboard position respectable while working at his treadmill desk.








Steven Soderberg
VP, Information Technology







Steven Soderberg
VP, Information Technology
Steven has been a CIO and VP of IT at Bay Area companies for over 18 years. He’s held executive positions at the highest of high-tech companies (Symantec, PGP, Force10 Networks, Vocera) and the lowest of low-tech companies (Robert Mondavi). During those years, Steven also held leadership positions in logistics, materials management, tech support, customer service and winery operations. With a career emphasis on business application systems, his responsibilities span application software systems, networking and corporate infrastructure. Steven has a B.A. from Stanford University and now lives in the East Bay, which makes it easy for him to escape to Tahoe, where he snow skis and water skis every chance he gets.








Michael Jones
VP, Software Engineering







Michael Jones
VP, Software Engineering
Michael has been with Fitbit since 2009 and is the VP of Services and Infrastructure Engineering. He has more than 16 years of experience managing, leading and scaling teams and web applications for major brands like American Greetings, CNET and Excite@Home. In his current role, Michael leads teams that enable Fitbit’s core online connected experience. He lives with his wife and son, and gets his steps in by going on long hikes outside of San Francisco.








Shelten Yuen
VP, Research







Shelten Yuen
VP, Research
Shelten leads advanced Research and Development at Fitbit. He is responsible for creating new sensors using sensor data to make intelligent, engaging features in devices. Under Shelten’s leadership, Fitbit developed Fitbit's PurePulse™ heart rate, sleep tracking and activity tracking technologies. Prior to Fitbit, Shelten was a researcher in surgical robotics, cellular mechanics and missile defense. He received his Ph.D. in Engineering Sciences from Harvard University, has over 15 years’ experience as an engineer and researcher, and is an inventor on more than 100 granted patents. When Shelten isn't busy tinkering with technology, he enjoys tinkering on the guitar and rocking out with his kids.








Thomas Hudson
VP, Investor Relations







Thomas Hudson
VP, Investor Relations
With more than 19 years on the buy-side, Tom brings a unique perspective to his position as Fitbit’s Chartered Financial Analyst. Prior to Fitbit, he analyzed and invested in some of the nation’s leading growth-oriented businesses. He also led the investor relations team at two of Silicon Valley’s top global consumer technology brands, eBay and PayPal, during a transformative period of time. Tom earned his BSBA with a concentration in finance at Boston University’s School of Management. Having relocated from Manhattan, he’s an outdoor enthusiast who relishes the California sunshine and spends his free time running, biking, paddling and playing tennis.








Peter Molettiere
VP, Software Engineering







Peter Molettiere
VP, Software Engineering
Peter came to Fitbit in 2011 to implement a sustainable software engineering process, and  has helped the company develop a stronger, faster and more agile team. Prior to Fitbit, he spent 5 years managing Nokia’s SNAP Mobile team, where he delivered the N-Gage multi-user gaming experience to Java feature phones. Peter has 20 years experience in the startup world, with a high-profile client history that includes Sony Online Entertainment, EA Games, Silicon Graphics, Netscape, Alexa Internet and Verizon. He is also an avid yogi who enjoys trying to burn more than 3000 calories per day.








Mark O’Hagan
VP, Corporate Controller







Mark O’Hagan
VP, Corporate Controller
Mark joined Fitbit in December 2014 to lead core accounting functions, scale the accounting team in preparation for the 2015 IPO and ensure the company’s success as a high-growth public company. Prior to Fitbit, he spent 10 years in VP Corporate Controller positions in technology related companies—first with Omnicell, a provider of medication management solutions, and more recently with Vocera Communications, where he helped the mobile communication company through their successful IPO process. Before those roles, Mark worked for 13 years in various senior finance roles at 3Com Corporation. He has a B.A. in Business Administration and German from Loughborough University in the U.K.








Samir Kapoor
VP of Firmware Engineering







Samir Kapoor
VP of Firmware Engineering
Samir is VP of Firmware Engineering at Fitbit and is responsible for firmware on all Fitbit products. Prior to his time with Fitbit, Samir spent 10 years with Qualcomm, where he was VP of Engineering and held multiple leadership roles in software engineering and wireless technology development for mobile and consumer products. Before that, he was the Director of Engineering at Flarion Technologies (acquired by Qualcomm in 2006), and was an early member of the team that developed the innovative FLASH-OFDM technology. Samir holds over 20 patents in the U.S., received his Ph.D. in Electrical Engineering from the University of Notre Dame and received his M.B.A. from the Wharton School at the University of Pennsylvania.








Des Power
EMEA Managing Director







Des Power
EMEA Managing Director
As part of Fitbit’s new EMEA headquarters in Dublin, Des oversees markets in Europe, the Middle East and Africa. By focusing on team building and customer engagement, he has developed teams with a history of outstanding regional and global performance. Before joining Fitbit, Des was at Philips and Harman International, where he worked on a range of consumer audio products, while focusing on sales, marketing, product strategy and business leadership. He earned a bachelor's degree in engineering and a master’s degree in electronic engineering from Trinity College. Des is also an Irish national, so he’s thrilled to be back in his homeland with family and friends.








Jacob Wallin
VP, Treasurer







Jacob Wallin
VP, Treasurer
As our VP Treasurer, Jacob is responsible for maintaining the company’s banking infrastructure and managing key risks including the impact of foreign exchange and other financial market rates. Jacob has held treasury roles and corporate finance roles at Electronic Data Systems, ASML, Network Equipment Technologies, Electronic Arts and Verifone. He also brings years of international experience from EDS in New Zealand and Belgium. Jacob is a Swedish Institute graduate scholar at Comenius University in Bratislava, Slovakia, has an MBA in International Finance from Thunderbird School of Global Management, is a regular guest speaker at treasury conferences and is an active member of the Association for Financial Professionals.








Adam Pellegrini
VP, Digital Health







Adam Pellegrini
VP, Digital Health
As our VP of Digital Health, Adam is responsible for leading the vision, strategies and programs that support Fitbit’s integration into healthcare systems around the world. In his role, Adam harnesses the power of Fitbit products, software and services to help create better clinical health outcomes, while identifying new revenue opportunities that will build on the company’s current momentum in disease management, insurance and wellness programs. Previously, he served as Vice President of Digital Health at Walgreens Boots Alliance, where he led a team of seasoned industry executives to build out the next generation of digital and mHealth platforms. He also led marketing and product strategy at HealthyCircles, worked as a product manager for Microsoft Healthvault and managed the online strategy for the American Cancer Society.








Andrei Pitis
VP Engineering and Head of Bucharest Office







Andrei Pitis
VP Engineering and Head of Bucharest Office
With over 20 years of tech leadership experience between Romania and the United States, Andrei leads the growth of Fitbit’s Bucharest office. He joined Fitbit along with the rest of the team at VectorWatch where he was Founder and CEO. Before that, Andrei was an active Angel Investor in several startups and held several tech leadership positions. In his spare time, he acts as the co-founder of the Innovation Labs pre-accelerator program in Romania and also serves on the board of ANIS, a leading software industry association. Andrei holds a BSc and a MSc in Computer Science from the Polytechnic University of Bucharest. He enjoys spending every available long weekend with his wife and two daughters city-strolling while improving his skills in urban photography throughout Europe and beyond.








Lisa Gross
VP, Human Resources North America & Acting Global HR Head







Lisa Gross
VP, Human Resources North America & Acting Global HR Head
As the VP of HR for North America and Acting Global HR Head, Lisa is responsible for leading Fitbit’s Global Human Resources initiatives. Prior to Fitbit, she held various HR Leadership positions in top global companies across diverse industries—including General Electric, Tyco Electronics, Applied Materials, and Bayer Healthcare, where she most recently served as Vice President, Human Resources. With an M.S. in Organizational Psychology from Columbia University and a B.S. in Psychology from UCLA, Lisa is passionate about developing talent and leadership capabilities, building organizational effectiveness, and fostering diversity. Lisa is an avid explorer who enjoys taking her Fitbit tracker traveling, hiking, kayaking, camping, and skiing with her husband and three teenagers.








Eric Lentell
VP, Legal







Eric Lentell
VP, Legal
Eric is Vice President of Legal at Fitbit. Since joining Fitbit in September 2014, he has held multiple positions in our legal department. Before joining the team, Eric served as Director, Senior Corporate Counsel at VeriFone, Inc. Prior to that, he held a position as Corporate Counsel at DISH Network L.L.C. Eric earned a B.S. in Business Administration from the University of Colorado at Boulder Leeds School of Business and a J.D. from the University of Colorado School of Law. In his spare time, Eric enjoys skiing, running and spending time with his wife and their daughter.








Jeff Devine
EVP, Operations







Jeff Devine
EVP, Operations
Jeff Devine has served as Fitbit’s Executive Vice President of Operations since February 2017. Before joining Fitbit, he spent two years as Chief Operating Officer of uBeam Inc., a wireless charging company. Before that, he spent five years as VP of Supply Chain Management at Cisco Systems, Inc., a networking information technology company. Jeff also spent time as Senior Vice President of Global Operations at Palm, Inc., a smartphone company acquired by Hewlett-Packard in July 2010 and has held several senior level positions at Nokia and Boeing. He earned his B.S. in mechanical engineering from the University of Dayton and an M.B.A. from the Cox School of Business at Southern Methodist University.








Keith Noah
VP, Channel Sales







Keith Noah
VP, Channel Sales
Keith joined Fitbit in 2012 and is the VP of Channel Sales, responsible for the US and Canada.  He has over 25 years of sales and marketing experience in the technology industry, most recently with TomTom and Palm. Keith holds a B.A. in Liberal Arts and Sciences from the University of Illinois.








Jonathan Oakes
VP Product Management







Jonathan Oakes
VP Product Management
As VP of Product Management, Jonathan is responsible for defining the products, features and experiences that deliver on Fitbit’s vision, mission and business goals. Jonathan has over 15 years of experience in high technology. He launched 12 products while leading Product Management at Amazon for the Kindle eReader and Fire Tablet product lines, spanning both hardware and software. He also held multiple product management and business development leadership positions at Hewlett-Packard and Palm Computing. Earlier in his career, he founded and ran ThinAirApps, an early pioneer in mobile software applications which he sold to Palm Computing in 2001. Jonathan has a BA in American Studies from Skidmore College and an MBA from Harvard Business School.








Mark Silverio
SVP, Americas Sales







Mark Silverio
SVP, Americas Sales
Mark is responsible for Sales and Channel Marketing in North and South America—focusing on growing Fitbit’s business with our best in class retail partners. Mark has over 20 years of sales and marketing experience with mobile and wireless consumer electronics products. Prior to Fitbit, he led US sales for TomTom, was VP of Sales and Marketing for Navigon (now a Garmin brand) and held a variety of sales management roles in the PDA and smartphone industry at Palm. Mark has a B.S. in Marketing from the Carroll School of Management at Boston College. He and his Fitbit tracker spend a lot of time visiting customers and logging steps by running through airports.









 Headquarters

                                San Francisco
                            

                                405 Howard StreetSuite 550San Francisco, Ca 94105
                            
Directions












                            Boston
                        

                            One Marina Park DriveSuite 701Boston, MA 02210415-513-1000
                        
Directions



                            San Diego
                        

                            15255 Innovation Drive  Suite 200  San Diego, CA 92128
                        
Directions



                            Dublin
                        

                            76 Lower Baggot Street,Dublin 2, Ireland
                        
Directions



                            Hong Kong
                        

                            Unit 828, Level 8, AdmiraltyCentre Tower II, 18 HarcourtRoad, Admiralty, Hong Kong
                        
Directions



                            Shanghai
                        

                            Level 23, 5 CorporateAvenue 150 Hubin Road,Shanghai, 200021 China
                        
Directions



                            Seoul
                        

                            POSCO Center Building, WestTower, Suite #1134, 440Teheran-ro,Kangnam-gu,Seoul 135777
                        
Directions



                            Minsk
                        

                            51A K. Tsetkin St., 6th FLoor, Suite 10,Minsk, Belarus 220004
                        
Directions



                            New Delhi
                        

                            Flat no.4, 1st Floor,Building No.600, SuryaKunj, Ram Singh Marg,Saidulajab, New Delhi110030
                        
Directions



                            Tokyo
                        

                            22F Shibuya Mark City, 1-12-1Dogenzaka Shibuya-ku,Tokyo 150-0043
                        
Directions



                            Singapore
                        

                            #19-02 Guoco Tower1 Wallich Street Singapore 078881
                        
Directions





Contact Us
Choose your inquiry topic below

Brand Partnerships
Retail Sales
Corporate Wellness
General/Other
PR/Media
Submit your Fitbit success story
Customer Support
























































Fitbit - Wikipedia





















 






Fitbit

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Fitbit Inc.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: FIT


Industry
Consumer electronics


Founded
San Francisco, California, United States (May 1, 2007 (2007-05-01))[1]


Founders
James Park
Eric Friedman


Headquarters
San Francisco, California, United States



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

James Park (CEO)
Eric Friedman (CTO)


Products
Fitbit Tracker


Subsidiaries
Pebble


Website
www.fitbit.com


Fitbit (NYSE: FIT) is an American company headquartered in San Francisco, California, known for its products of the same name, which are activity trackers, wireless-enabled wearable technology devices that measure data such as the number of steps walked, heart rate, quality of sleep, steps climbed, and other personal metrics involved in fitness. The first product released was the Fitbit Tracker.[2] Some evidence has found that the use of similar devices results in less weight loss rather than more.[3]



Contents


1 Products

1.1 Health effects
1.2 Accuracy
1.3 Recall


2 History
3 Reception

3.1 Awards
3.2 Privacy concerns
3.3 Surveillance


4 See also
5 References
6 External links



Products[edit]
Main article: List of Fitbit products




The Fitbit Flex, with the functioning unit out of the replaceable wristband.


Alongside the activity trackers, Fitbit offers a website and mobile app for iOS, Android and Windows 10 Mobile.[4] The trackers can be synced to smart devices via Bluetooth or uploaded to a computer running Windows or macOS using the Bluetooth USB dongle. Users have the ability to log their food, activities, and weight, to track over time and can set daily and weekly goals for themselves for steps, calories burned and consumed, and distance walked. Calories in versus calories out is more accurately measured when app users keep their tracker on. However, the app can be used without a tracker to measure calories on a lifestyle app. The app offers a community page where users can challenge themselves and compete against other users. The social element anticipates an increase in motivation, finding that users take an average of 700 more steps per day when they have friends on the app.[5] Users can choose to share their progress pictures and achievement badges.
Health effects[edit]
In those who are overweight or obese, a 2016 study indicates that the use of wearable technology combined with standard behavioral weight loss intervention results in less weight loss after two years of use when compared to usual weight loss interventions.[3] There was no evidence that the devices altered the amount that people exercised or their diet compared to control.[3] A 2015 study found use of lifestyle apps demonstrate promising results in promoting healthy living in adults.[6] It is unclear whether these devices affect the amount of physical activity children engage in.[7]
Accuracy[edit]
A small 2014 study of eight fit band devices during a 69-minute workouts that included 13 different activities found the bands were at best "reasonably accurate", with the Fitbit Zip and Fitbit One scoring 10.1% and 10.4% error ratings, respectively.[8]
A small 2015 study had participants wear multiple devices on their wrists and hips performing different walking/running speeds on a treadmill. Fitbit devices worn on the hip accurately measured steps taken within 1 step of 100% accuracy. Devices worn on the wrist, however, were off by an average of 11 steps per minute. When measuring the number of calories burned, Fitbit devices worn on the hip underestimated by an average of 6%, while devices worn on the wrist overestimated calories burned by 21%. Authors concluded that both the Fitbit One and Fitbit Flex devices reliably measured step counts and energy expenditure, with hip-based Fitbit devices being more accurate than wrist-based devices.[9] These measurements did not address the question of health effects.
Recall[edit]
Fitbit, working with the Consumer Protection Safety Commission, recalled the Fitbit Force on February 20, 2014 because some users experienced allergic reactions to the materials used in the product.[10] On March 12, 2014 the Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC) made the recall official.[11] At that time it was revealed that There were 9,900 reports of skin irritation and 250 reports of blistering .[11] The product is no longer for sale on Fitbit's website.
In April 2017, a woman claimed her Fitbit Flex 2 malfunctioned and caught on fire, causing second-degree burns on her arm.[12] Following an investigation, Fitbit is adamant the cause of the exploding tracker was due to external forces, assuring their customers they are not aware of any other complaints and they can confidently wear their own Fitbit with no concerns.[13]
History[edit]
Headquartered in San Francisco, California, Fitbit was founded on May 1, 2007 by James Park (CEO) and Eric Friedman (CTO). On May 7, 2015, Fitbit announced it had filed for IPO with a NYSE listing.[14] The IPO was filed for $358 million.[15] The company's stock began trading with the symbol "FIT"[16] on June 18, 2015.[17] After Fitbit's stocks fell more than 50% in 2016, CEO James Park announced in October that the company was undergoing a major transformation from what he called a "consumer electronics company" to a "digital healthcare company."[18]
On December 7, 2016, Fitbit officially announced that they acquired assets from Pebble, including key personnel, as the company decided to stop producing wearable technology. The acquisition excludes Pebble's hardware products.[19][20]
In January 2017, Fitbit acquired Romania-based smartwatch startup Vector Watch SRL for $15 million and it also paid $23 million for Pebble, a smartwatch brand that started as a Kickstarter campaign.[21][22]
Reception[edit]




Dedicated Fitbit retail stand stocked with different Fitbit Flex trackers


Awards[edit]
Fitbit has won numerous awards, including runner-up at TechCrunch50 in 2008[23] and CES 2009 Innovation honoree and best in the Health & Wellness category.[24] In 2016, Fitbit ranked 37 out of the 50 most innovative companies for that year.[25]
Privacy concerns[edit]
To set up and use the hardware, one has to create an account with Fitbit and agree to data collection, transfer and privacy rules.[26]
Starting in June 2011, Fitbit was criticized for its website's default activity-sharing settings, which made users' manually-entered physical activities available for public viewing.[27] All users had the option to make their physical activity information private, but some users were unaware that the information was public by default. One specific issue, which technology blogs made fun of, was that some users were including details about their sex lives in their daily exercise logs, and this information was, by default, publicly available.[28] Fitbit responded to criticism by making all such data private by default and requesting that search engines remove indexed user profile pages from their databases.[27]
The company's devices have also been used in criminal investigations; in one instance, a rape claim against an unnamed intruder was turned around to a criminal charge for false reports based on data from the claimant's Fitbit.[29][30][31][32][33]
Surveillance[edit]
A Fitbit played a role in solving a murder.[34] Connie Dabate was murdered by her husband Richard Dabate. Initially, Richard framed the situation, telling police and law enforcement officials that an intruder had broken into their home and fatally shot his wife. However, Connie’s Fitbit tracker showed that she was at the gym at the time Richard told police his wife was shot. Using Connie’s Fitbit and analyzing her movements, analysts were able to create a timeline that proved Richard had created a false story.[35]
On March 5, 2017, Kelly Herron[36] was using a public bathroom, when a man, who had been convicted of previous sex crimes, attempted to rape Herron. Herron fought her way out of the crime and the story became widely circulated because her Fitbit had tracked her frantic movements during her escape.
On March 10, 2015, Jeannine M. Risley fabricated a story[37] in which an intruder appeared in her employer’s home she was staying at and raped her. Risley told police that a man had assaulted her around midnight. Police found a Fitbit lying on the floor when they arrived at the scene. Prosecutors used the Fitbit as evidence and data to determine what had occurred. The Fitbit revealed that Risley was active throughout the night, and the Fitbit surveillance analysis demonstrated Risley had not gone to bed like she stated to the police; therefore, proving Risley had lied to the police.
See also[edit]

Jawbone
Key finder
Microsoft Band
Misfit (company)
Quantified Self
Smart keychain
Smartwatch
Garmin

References[edit]


^ "Fitbit Company Profile". CrunchBase. TechCrunch. Retrieved 2009-09-17. 
^ Ewalt, David M. (2010-06-11). "Getting Fitbit". Forbes. Retrieved 2017-03-29. 
^ a b c Jakicic, JM; Davis, KK; Rogers, RJ; King, WC; Marcus, MD; Helsel, D; Rickman, AD; Wahed, AS; Belle, SH (September 20, 2016). "Effect of Wearable Technology Combined With a Lifestyle Intervention on Long-term Weight Loss: The IDEA Randomized Clinical Trial". JAMA. 316 (11): 1161–1171. ISSN 0098-7484. PMID 27654602. doi:10.1001/jama.2016.12858. Among young adults with a BMI between 25 and less than 40, the addition of a wearable technology device to a standard behavioral intervention resulted in less weight loss over 24 months. Devices that monitor and provide feedback on physical activity may not offer an advantage over standard behavioral weight loss approaches. 
^ Bell, Karissa. "Fitbit Updates App With Exercise and Run-Tracking Features". 
^ Graziano, Dan (January 5, 2017). "Fitbit's new software update makes your tracker more personal". 
^ Eysenbach, Gunther. "The Impact of a Web-Based App (eBalance) in Promoting Healthy Lifestyles: Randomized Controlled Trial". J Med Internet Res. 17: e56. PMC 4376125 . PMID 25732936. doi:10.2196/jmir.3682. 
^ Ridgers, ND; McNarry, MA; Mackintosh, KA (November 23, 2016). "Feasibility and Effectiveness of Using Wearable Activity Trackers in Youth: A Systematic Review.". JMIR mHealth and uHealth. 4 (4): e129. PMC 5143467 . PMID 27881359. doi:10.2196/mhealth.6540. 
^ "Does your fitness band really work? Scientists analyse tracking tech". Retrieved 2015-09-10. 
^ Diaz, Keith M.; Krupka, David J.; Chang, Melinda J.; Peacock, James; Ma, Yao; Goldsmith, Jeff; Schwartz, Joseph E.; Davidson, Karina W. "Fitbit®: An accurate and reliable device for wireless physical activity tracking". International Journal of Cardiology. 185: 138–140. PMC 4406840 . PMID 25795203. doi:10.1016/j.ijcard.2015.03.038. 
^ CEO letter 2/20/14. February 20, 2014.
^ a b "Fitbit Recalls Force Activity-Tracking Wristband Due to Risk of Skin Irritation". U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission. March 12, 2014. The firm has received about 9,900 reports of the wristband causing skin irritation and about 250 reports of blistering. 
^ Allen, Karma (April 29, 2017). "Fitbit says woman's tracker didn't explode on its own". ABC News. 
^ Baig, Edward C. (April 25, 2017). "Fitbit says it's investigating report of exploding Flex 2". USA Today. 
^ Hadi, Mohammed (May 7, 2015). "Fitbit Files for IPO, to Seek NYSE Listing". Bloomberg News. Retrieved 2015-05-10. 
^ Chris Ciaccia (June 2, 2015). "Fitbit Updates IPO Pricing". TheStreet. 
^ Jhonsa, Eric (May 7, 2015). "Fitbit files for IPO, reports strong growth/profits". Retrieved 2015-05-10. 
^ Ananya Bhattacharya (June 18, 2015). "Fitbit stock surges nearly 50%". Retrieved 2015-12-20. 
^ Stevenson, Abigail (October 6, 2016). "Fitbit CEO reveals he’s transforming the mission and purpose of the company". Retrieved 2016-10-06 – via CNBC. 
^ "Fitbit, Inc. Acquires Assets from Pebble". fitbit.com. Fitbit. December 7, 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-08. 
^ "Pebble’s Next Step". getpebble.com. December 7, 2016. Retrieved 2016-12-08. 
^ Butcher, Mike (January 11, 2017). "Fitbit acquires the Vector smart watch startup, as the wearable giant continues its roll-up". TechCrunch. Retrieved January 11, 2017. 
^ Niu, Evan (February 23, 2017). "Fitbit Paid $38 Million for Its 2 Smartwatch Acquisitions". TheMotleyFool. Retrieved April 5, 2017. 
^ "Yammer Takes Top Prize At TechCrunch50". TechCrunch. AOL. 
^ "CES Innovation Awards". International CES. 
^ Fast Company. “The Most Innovative Companies of 2016.” February 19, 2016. March 30, 2016.
^ "Terms Of Service” Creating an Account, February 9, 2017.
^ a b "Fitbit Blog". Fitbit Blog. 
^ Jack Loftus. "Dear Fitbit Users, Kudos On the 30 Minutes of "Vigorous Sexual Activity" Last Night". Gizmodo. Gawker Media. 
^ "Police: Woman’s fitness watch disproved rape report". ABC27. June 19, 2015. 
^ "Fitbit data just undermined a woman’s rape claim". Fusion. June 29, 2015. 
^ "When Fitbit Is the Expert Witness". The Atlantic. November 19, 2014. 
^ David Glance (November 24, 2014). "How your Fitbit data can and will be used against you in a court of law". The Conversation. 
^ AP (April 28, 2017). "Man pleads not guilty in murder case using Fitbit evidence". The Associated Press. 
^ Schwedel, Heather (April 26, 2017). "How a Fitbit Helped Solve a Murder Case". Slate. ISSN 1091-2339. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 
^ Watts, Amanda. "Cops use murdered woman's Fitbit to charge her husband". CNN. Retrieved 19 June 2017. 
^ Narins, Elizabeth (March 13, 2017). "This Jogger Fought Off a Mid-Run Assault and Her Fitness Tracker Captured the Entire Thing". Cosmopolitan. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 
^ Gershman, Jacob (April 21, 2016). "Prosecutors Say Fitbit Device Exposed Fibbing in Rape Case". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2017-05-26. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Fitbit.



Official website





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Fitbit&oldid=790130721"					
Categories: American companies established in 2007Android (operating system) softwareCompanies established in 2007Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeElectronics companies established in 2007Electronics companies of the United StatesIOS softwareManufacturing companies based in San FranciscoManufacturing companies established in 2007Technology companies based in the San Francisco Bay AreaUniversal Windows Platform apps2015 initial public offeringsHidden categories: Use mdy dates from January 2017 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


EestiFrançaisItalianoРусскийSuomiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 11 July 2017, at 20:03.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









                    Fitbit Setup
                











































        Fitbit
        




Products


Fitness Wristbands and Clips




Fitbit Zip®





Fitbit One®





Fitbit Flex 2™





Fitbit Alta™





Heart Rate + Fitness Wristbands




Fitbit Alta HR™
New





Fitbit Charge 2™





Smart Fitness Watches




Fitbit Blaze™





Smart Scale




Fitbit® Aria®









FITBIT ACCESSORIES








Designer
Collections






Not sure which product is right for you? FIND YOUR FIT




Why Fitbit

Why Fitbit
What's New
Our Technology
FitScience
About Us



Get Motivated

Fitstar
Events
Blog
FitForGood
Fitbit Premium



App & Dashboard

App Tour
Fitbit Challenges
Compatible Apps



Help

Product Help
Forums
Wear & Care
How-To Videos








Your cart is currently empty. Let's shop



                                                Store
                                            






                                            Log in
                                        



                                            Setup
                                        











Get the Fitbit App to Set Up Your Device















Don't have a mobile device available?


Download For Windows


                            2.0.1.6802 / November 17, 2016
                          

Mac
Mac 10.5
Windows 10
PC
Windows XP






Aria
Wi-Fi Smart Scale

Start here




Ultra
Activity Tracker

Start here



                                Want to try out Fitbit.com before getting a device? Sign up for a free account here.
                            



Need help setting up your device? Get Help Information for:


                                        Alta Wireless Activity Tracker
                                    

                                        Blaze Wireless Activity Tracker
                                    

                                        Surge Wireless Activity Tracker
                                    

                                        Charge HR Wireless Activity Tracker
                                    

                                        Charge Wireless Activity Tracker
                                    

                                            Force Wireless Activity Tracker
                                        

                                        Flex Wireless Activity Tracker
                                    

                                        One Wireless Activity Tracker
                                    

                                        Zip Wireless Activity Tracker
                                    

                                            Ultra Wireless Activity Tracker
                                        

                                                Aria Wi-Fi Smart Scale
                                            


Go





















































Fitbit Login











































        Fitbit
        




Products


Fitness Wristbands and Clips




Fitbit Zip®





Fitbit One®





Fitbit Flex 2™





Fitbit Alta™





Heart Rate + Fitness Wristbands




Fitbit Alta HR™
New





Fitbit Charge 2™





Smart Fitness Watches




Fitbit Blaze™





Smart Scale




Fitbit® Aria®









FITBIT ACCESSORIES








Designer
Collections






Not sure which product is right for you? FIND YOUR FIT




Why Fitbit

Why Fitbit
What's New
Our Technology
FitScience
About Us



Get Motivated

Fitstar
Events
Blog
FitForGood
Fitbit Premium



App & Dashboard

App Tour
Fitbit Challenges
Compatible Apps



Help

Product Help
Forums
Wear & Care
How-To Videos








Your cart is currently empty. Let's shop



                                                Store
                                            






                                            Log in
                                        



                                            Setup
                                        











Please review the following errors:You must be logged in to continue.







                            Sign up
                            with a free account before getting a device






















                                                    I agree to the Fitbit Terms of Service and Privacy Policy.
                                                




													I acknowledge that my personal data will be transferred to the United States, in accordance with the Privacy Policy





                                                    Keep me updated about Fitbit products, news, and promotions.
                                                





											Continue
										




	                                or
	                            




                                            Sign up with Facebook





                                            Sign up with Google



	                                    It's fast and easy. We promise never to post anything without your permission.
	                                




					
						Already a member? Log in now





                                Log in
                            





                                            Log in with Google





                                            Log in with Facebook




								or
							

















Forgot password?

Remember Me





											Log In
										






					
						Want to try out Fitbit before getting a device? Sign up for a free account





						Create a Password
					



                            Hi, 


                            Google account connected
						

                            Facebook account connected
						




























                                                Keep me updated about Fitbit products, news, and promotions.
                                            




                                                I agree to the Fitbit Terms of Service and Privacy Policy.
                                            




												I acknowledge that my personal data will be transferred to the United States, in accordance with the Privacy Policy






										Create Account
									





Already a member?
					
						Log in now
					







            Tell Us About Yourself
        

            We use this information to improve accuracy.
        








                                        Name
                                    



 









                                Gender
                            



                                            Select
                                        

                                            Female
                                        

                                            Male
                                        






                                Birthday
                            








                                Height
                            


                                        Feet, Inches
                                    

                                        Centimeters
                                    











                                Weight
                            


                                        Pounds
                                    

                                        Stone
                                    

                                        Kilograms
                                    
















                        save profile
                    





























































Fitbit Flex Wireless Activity & Sleep Wristband










































        Fitbit
        




Products


Fitness Wristbands and Clips




Fitbit Zip®





Fitbit One®





Fitbit Flex 2™





Fitbit Alta™





Heart Rate + Fitness Wristbands




Fitbit Alta HR™
New





Fitbit Charge 2™





Smart Fitness Watches




Fitbit Blaze™





Smart Scale




Fitbit® Aria®









FITBIT ACCESSORIES








Designer
Collections






Not sure which product is right for you? FIND YOUR FIT




Why Fitbit

Why Fitbit
What's New
Our Technology
FitScience
About Us



Get Motivated

Fitstar
Events
Blog
FitForGood
Fitbit Premium



App & Dashboard

App Tour
Fitbit Challenges
Compatible Apps



Help

Product Help
Forums
Wear & Care
How-To Videos








Your cart is currently empty. Let's shop



                                                Store
                                            






                                            Log in
                                        



                                            Setup
                                        























Make fitness a lifestyle with Flex.









Wireless activity + sleep wristband

Watch video
BUY NOW 
BUY NOW 


















A wristband that makes fitness fashionable.


 















All-Day Activity
Track steps, distance, calories burned, active minutes, hourly activity & stationary time




Style + Accessories
Style the slim, removable tracker your way with Flex accessories from Fitbit and Tory Burch




Progress Display
See LEDs light up as you progress toward your daily goal




Wear + Life
Water-resistant wristband with a 5-day battery life*




Wireless Syncing
Sync stats wirelessly & automatically to leading smartphones and computers




Auto Sleep + Alarms
Monitor your sleep automatically & set a silent alarm





Black
Slate
Violet
Lime
Pink
Navy
Tangerine
Teal
Red
Blue


















All-Day Activity
Set a goal and go.
Stay focused on your goals and get motivated to be more active with Flex—a slim, stylish device that tracks all-day activity like steps taken, distance traveled, calories burned and active minutes.
Stay focused on your goals and get motivated to be more active with Flex—a slim, stylish device that tracks all-day activity like steps taken, distance traveled, calories burned and active minutes.
















Progress Display
See your day in a whole new light.
Flex lets you see how every day is stacking up with LEDs that light up like a scoreboard as you get 20% closer to completing your step, calorie or distance goal.
Flex lets you see how every day is stacking up with LEDs that light up like a scoreboard as you get 20% closer to completing your step, calorie or distance goal.

















Auto Sleep + Alarms
Step. Sleep. Wake. Repeat.
Fitbit Flex automatically tracks how long and how well you sleep—no tapping necessary—so you can monitor your sleep trends without interrupting your nighttime routine. It also includes a silent, vibrating alarm to make your wake-up call more peaceful.
Fitbit Flex automatically tracks how long and how well you sleep—no tapping necessary—so you can monitor your sleep trends without interrupting your nighttime routine. It also includes a silent, vibrating alarm to make your wake-up call more peaceful.

















Style + Accessories
Wear Flex your way, every day.
Style your Flex tracker with bright accessory bands from Fitbit. To change bands, simply pop the slim Flex tracker out of your wristband and slip it into the accessory that fits your personality.
Style your Flex tracker with bright accessory bands from Fitbit. To change bands, simply pop the slim Flex tracker out of your wristband and slip it into the accessory that fits your personality.

Buy Flex bands

















Wireless Syncing
All your stats, always in sync.

                                        Flex syncs your daily stats to your computer and over 200+ leading smartphones, and shows your progress in easy-to-read charts and graphs, to give you the push you need to keep moving toward your goals.
                                    

                                        Flex syncs your daily stats to your computer and over 200+ leading smartphones, and shows your progress in easy-to-read charts and graphs, to give you the push you need to keep moving toward your goals.
                                    
















Wear + Life
With you all the time.
Flex fits comfortably around your wrist, is water-resistant, and has a 5-day battery life*, so you can wear it day to night. And with a variety of available accessory bands, you’ll find the right Flex for every occasion.
Flex fits comfortably around your wrist, is water-resistant, and has a 5-day battery life*, so you can wear it day to night. And with a variety of available accessory bands, you’ll find the right Flex for every occasion.















Everything you need, all in one place.
A seamless app experience from devices to dashboard


























See progress
View your progress and analyze your trends with easy-to-read charts and graphs




Compete in challenges
Invite friends and family to share stats, send cheers & taunts, and compete on the leaderboard




Log food
Log food fast with a calorie estimator, meal shortcuts & expanded food database




Record workouts
Log workouts, see a monthly exercise calendar, & use MobileRun to track run stats and map routes




Earn badges
Get goal progress notifications & celebrate  fitness milestones with badges




SLEEP BETTER
Set sleep goals, review sleep quality& see weekly sleep trend graphs



Learn more



















Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Pinterest
Share on Google+





Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Pinterest
Share on Google+





Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Pinterest
Share on Google+





Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Pinterest
Share on Google+





Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Pinterest
Share on Google+





Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Pinterest
Share on Google+





Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Pinterest
Share on Google+





























It is the most wearable, best-syncing device in the scrum, with the best app to boot. And it does all this at a great price.


The Flex offers all the features you'd desire most in a fitness tracker while also being more attractive and more affordable than its competitors.


Fitbit has a winner with the Flex. It’s comfortable to wear, works very well and, at only $100, priced competitively.










 


Specifications




Sizing

Small
Large





                                                
                                                    
                                                        size small  fits wrists  5.5” - 6.5”
                                                    
                                                    
                                                
                                            

                                                0.6”
                                            



                                                
                                                    
                                                        size large  fits wrists  6.5” - 8.2”
                                                    
                                                    
                                                
                                            

                                                0.6”
                                            



                                        Flex includes both small and large wristband. The band should be worn loosely. Download Flex Sizing Guide for more information.
                                    


What’s Included

Removable Fitbit Flex™ tracker2 wristbands (small and large)Charging cableWireless sync dongle






see more specs


Sensors and Components

3-axis accelerometer
Vibration motor



Display

LED display with 5 white indicator lights
Tap twice to see progress against your Main Goal
Tap rapidly for 1-2 seconds to start or stop sleep tracking



Battery and Power
We recommend charging your Flex every few days to ensure you are always tracking.

Battery life: up to 5 days
Battery type: Lithium-polymer
Charge time: One to two hours
Radio transceiver: Bluetooth 4.0



Memory

Tracks 7 days of detailed motion data, minute by minute
Tracks daily totals for past 30 days



Water Resistance
Flex has been tested up to 1 ATM meaning it is sweat, rain and splash proof. However, the device is not swim proof. We also recommend taking Flex off before showering because, as with any wearable device, it’s best for your skin if the band stays dry and clean.


Care
If the band gets wet or if you sweat in it, remove and completely dry the band before putting it back on. Clean the band with a mild soap-free cleanser like Cetaphil Gentle Skin Cleanser or Aquanil. Give your wrist a rest by taking the band off every now and then. Learn more.


Materials
The Flex wristband is made of a flexible, durable elastomer material similar to that used in many sports watches. Flex also has a surgical-grade stainless steel clasp.


Environmental Requirements


                                                        
                                                            
                                                                Operating temperature: -4° to 113° F
                                                            
                                                            
                                                        
                                                    

                                                        
                                                            
                                                                Maximum operating altitude: 30,000 feet
                                                            
                                                            
                                                        
                                                    



Syncing

                                                    Flex syncs automatically and wirelessly to tablets, computers and 200+ leading iOS, Android and Windows smartphones using Bluetooth 4.0 wireless technology.
                                                


                                                        
                                                            
                                                                Syncing range: 20 feet
                                                            
                                                            
                                                        
                                                    
Syncing to computers requires Internet connection and USB port
Syncing to mobile devices requires Bluetooth and Internet connection
Syncs with Windows Vista and later, Mac OS X 10.6 and up, iPhone 4S and later, iPad 3 gen. and later, and leading Android and Windows devices





Sensors and Components

3-axis accelerometer
Vibration motor



Display

LED display with 5 white indicator lights
Tap twice to see progress against your Main Goal
Tap rapidly for 1-2 seconds to start or stop sleep tracking



Battery and Power
We recommend charging your Flex every few days to ensure you are always tracking.

Battery life: up to 5 days
Battery type: Lithium-polymer
Charge time: One to two hours
Radio transceiver: Bluetooth 4.0



Memory

Tracks 7 days of detailed motion data, minute by minute
Tracks daily totals for past 30 days





What’s Included

Removable Fitbit Flex™ tracker2 wristbands (small and large)Charging cableWireless sync dongle






Water Resistance
Flex has been tested up to 1 ATM meaning it is sweat, rain and splash proof. However, the device is not swim proof. We also recommend taking Flex off before showering because, as with any wearable device, it’s best for your skin if the band stays dry and clean.


Care
If the band gets wet or if you sweat in it, remove and completely dry the band before putting it back on. Clean the band with a mild soap-free cleanser like Cetaphil Gentle Skin Cleanser or Aquanil. Give your wrist a rest by taking the band off every now and then. Learn more.


Materials
The Flex wristband is made of a flexible, durable elastomer material similar to that used in many sports watches. Flex also has a surgical-grade stainless steel clasp.


Environmental Requirements


                                                        
                                                            
                                                                Operating temperature: -4° to 113° F
                                                            
                                                            
                                                        
                                                    

                                                        
                                                            
                                                                Maximum operating altitude: 30,000 feet
                                                            
                                                            
                                                        
                                                    



Syncing

                                                    Flex syncs automatically and wirelessly to tablets, computers and 200+ leading iOS, Android and Windows smartphones using Bluetooth 4.0 wireless technology.
                                                


                                                        
                                                            
                                                                Syncing range: 20 feet
                                                            
                                                            
                                                        
                                                    
Syncing to computers requires Internet connection and USB port
Syncing to mobile devices requires Bluetooth and Internet connection
Syncs with Windows Vista and later, Mac OS X 10.6 and up, iPhone 4S and later, iPad 3 gen. and later, and leading Android and Windows devices





Battery and Power
We recommend charging your Flex every few days to ensure you are always tracking.

Battery life: up to 5 days
Battery type: Lithium-polymer
Charge time: One to two hours
Radio transceiver: Bluetooth 4.0



Environmental Requirements


                                                        
                                                            
                                                                Operating temperature: -4° to 113° F
                                                            
                                                            
                                                        
                                                    

                                                        
                                                            
                                                                Maximum operating altitude: 30,000 feet
                                                            
                                                            
                                                        
                                                    



Memory

Tracks 7 days of detailed motion data, minute by minute
Tracks daily totals for past 30 days



Syncing

                                                    Flex syncs automatically and wirelessly to tablets, computers and 200+ leading iOS, Android and Windows smartphones using Bluetooth 4.0 wireless technology.
                                                


                                                        
                                                            
                                                                Syncing range: 20 feet
                                                            
                                                            
                                                        
                                                    
Syncing to computers requires Internet connection and USB port
Syncing to mobile devices requires Bluetooth and Internet connection
Syncs with Windows Vista and later, Mac OS X 10.6 and up, iPhone 4S and later, iPad 3 gen. and later, and leading Android and Windows devices



















                    *Your fully charged Fitbit Flex has a battery life of up to 5 days. Note that battery life and charge cycles vary with use, settings and many other factors; actual results will vary.

                    
                        
                    
                


Flex





















All-Day Activity
Track steps, distance, calories burned, active minutes, hourly activity & stationary time




Progress Display
See LEDs light up as you progress toward your daily goal




Sleep + Alarms
Monitor how long and how well you sleep & wake with a silent alarm




Style + Accessories
Style the slim, removable tracker your way with Flex accessories from Fitbit and Tory Burch




Wear + Life
Water-resistant wristband with a 5-day battery life




Wireless Syncing
Sync stats wirelessly & automatically to leading smartphones and computers





Black
Slate
Violet
Lime
Pink
Navy
Tangerine
Teal
Red
Blue

Add to cart
Flex includes both small and large wristband.Download Flex Sizing Guide to pick the right fit.























































Fitbit Store: Buy Surge, Blaze, Charge 2, Charge HR, Charge, Flex 2, Flex, One, Zip & Aria

























Products


Fitness Wristbands and Clips




Fitbit Zip®





Fitbit One®





Fitbit Flex 2™





Fitbit Alta™





Heart Rate + Fitness Wristbands




Fitbit Alta HR™
New





Fitbit Charge 2™





Smart Fitness Watches




Fitbit Blaze™





Fitbit Surge™





Wi-Fi Smart Scale




Fitbit® Aria®









FITBIT ACCESSORIES








Designer
Collections






Not sure which product is right for you? FIND YOUR FIT




Why Fitbit

Why Fitbit
What's New
Our Technology

FitScience

About Us



Get Motivated

Fitstar
Events
Blog
FitForGood
Fitbit Premium



App & Dashboard

App Tour
Fitbit Challenges
Compatible Apps



Help

Product Help
Forums
Wear & Care
How-To Videos








Your cart is currently empty. Let's shop



                            Store
                        






                        Dashboard
                        








Your cart is currently empty. Let's shop



Store





Log in


Setup










Store
Products
Accessories

Services
Apparel
Compare trackers


Alta HR
Charge 2
Blaze
Flex 2
Alta
Surge
Flex
One
Zip
Aria








Fit for Summer Up to $30 OffSale

Finish the season on a high note with Up to $30 off select styles plus Free 2-Day Shipping on $50+ now through July 28.
Up to $30 off select styles plus Free 2-Day shipping now through July 28
Shop the sale







Free shipping on $50+
45 day money back guarantee
1 year limited warranty




Back to top



The perks of shopping Fitbit.com:



Free shipping on $50+



45 day money back guarantee



1 year limited warranty







            Limited supply available. Offer expires July 28, 2017 5:00pm PDT. Offer includes up to ten (10) Fitbit products in any combination and applies to orders placed on Fitbit.com only. Exclusions apply. Cannot be combined with other discounts or applied after the order has been placed. Terms of offer are subject to change. Void where prohibited.
        





Let's talk!



Let a Fitbit Sales Specialist assist you in finding the right product.


START A CHAT


(844) 434-8248


Need customer support? Click here.














Fitbit Help

































































Community
Dashboard
Store







               We are aware of an issue with the Fitbit service, and our team is working hard to get it resolved quickly.
        
X








Community


Dashboard


Store
























Get the skinny on your Fitbit device







Zip







One







Flex







Flex 2







Alta



New




Alta HR







Charge HR







Charge 2







Blaze







Surge







Aria




More products









Force







Ultra







Charge














            Popular topics
        





What is Fitbit’s return and warranty policy?








How do I set up my tracker?








What should I know about my heart rate data?








Why won't my tracker sync?








How do I track my health and fitness goals with Fitbit?








How do I restart my tracker?












Find strength in numbers
Expert advice to the latest news. It’s all here.


Search the help forums





Let's talk

Get Support























Fitbit Help

































































Community
Dashboard
Store







               We are aware of an issue with the Fitbit service, and our team is working hard to get it resolved quickly.
        
X








Community


Dashboard


Store
























Get the skinny on your Fitbit device







Zip







One







Flex







Flex 2







Alta



New




Alta HR







Charge HR







Charge 2







Blaze







Surge







Aria




More products









Force







Ultra







Charge














            Popular topics
        





What is Fitbit’s return and warranty policy?








How do I set up my tracker?








What should I know about my heart rate data?








Why won't my tracker sync?








How do I track my health and fitness goals with Fitbit?








How do I restart my tracker?












Find strength in numbers
Expert advice to the latest news. It’s all here.


Search the help forums





Let's talk

Get Support























Compare
















Products


Fitness Wristbands and Clips




Fitbit Zip®





Fitbit One®





Fitbit Flex 2™





Fitbit Alta™





Heart Rate + Fitness Wristbands




Fitbit Alta HR™
New





Fitbit Charge 2™





Smart Fitness Watches




Fitbit Blaze™





Fitbit Surge™





Wi-Fi Smart Scale




Fitbit® Aria®









FITBIT ACCESSORIES








Designer
Collections






Not sure which product is right for you? FIND YOUR FIT




Why Fitbit

Why Fitbit
What's New
Our Technology

FitScience

About Us



Get Motivated

Fitstar
Events
Blog
FitForGood
Fitbit Premium



App & Dashboard

App Tour
Fitbit Challenges
Compatible Apps



Help

Product Help
Forums
Wear & Care
How-To Videos








Your cart is currently empty. Let's shop



                            Store
                        






                        Dashboard
                        








Your cart is currently empty. Let's shop



Store





Log in


Setup











Find the tracker that’s right for you.
With a simple quiz and quick comparison chart, Fitbit makes it easy to find your fit.
















Get a recommendation

Answer four questions to see the top suggestions for you.
Start Quiz Now




Compare on your own

Choose your favorite trackers and see how the features stack up.
Use Comparison Chart









Can’t choose? You don’t have to.
Pair multiple trackers to your account and switch between them without ever missing a step.
See more app features






Say hello to your new favorite app.
From creating food plans to finding friends, the Fitbit app has everything you need to see your progress and stay inspired on your fitness journey.
EXPLORE THE APP





















































































            
    Fitbit Inc.'s Worst Product in 2015 -- The Motley Fool

        








 












Skip to main content



The Motley Fool


Fool.com


Fool.co.uk


Fool.com.au


Fool.ca


Fool.sg


Fool.de





                Helping the world invest better since 1993.
            




Hi, Fool!




                    Premium Advice






                    Help

 Fool Answers
 Contact Us




Login





























Search

	    Search:
	







































Fitbit Inc.'s Worst Product in 2015
The ancient Fitbit Zip is intended to offer affordable access to the Fitbit ecosystem, but the wearables market has changed a lot since 2013.











                Sam Mattera
            

                (TMFMattera)



            
            Dec 31, 2015 at 11:06AM
            
            






Fitbit Zip. Photo: Fitbit

Fitbit (NYSE:FIT) released two new fitness trackers in 2015 -- the Charge HR and the Surge. It continues to sell four older models as well: the Flex, the Charge, the One, and the Zip. Priced between $60 and $250, all six of Fitbit's trackers wirelessly sync with its app and offer a variety of fitness-oriented features, including step and sleep tracking.
When it comes to wearbles, Fitbit remains the market leader, and for good reason. Almost all of these trackers have been well-received by critics and consumers alike. But some Fitbit products are better than others. Priced at just $60, the Fitbit Zip may look like a bargain, but it's the company's single worst product.
Fitbit's cheapest tracker is still overpricedGiven that it's Fitbit's cheapest tracker, it's not surprising that the Zip lacks many of the features found on the company's other models. The Zip can't track sleep or flights of stairs climbed like the One or the Flex can. It doesn't offer caller ID like the Charge and the Charge HR do. And it can't control the music playing on your mobile device or track your location with GPS like the Surge can.
So what exactly does the Zip do? Not much. In fact, it does just one thing: track the number of steps its wearer has taken. Admittedly, using that measurement, it can calculate your distance traveled and give a rough estimate of calories burned, but for all practical purposes, it's simply a pedometer.
Of course, there's a crucial difference between a generic, $5 pedometer and the Fitbit Zip -- pedometers don't wirelessly integrate with the Fitbit app. That software integration simultaneously adds a level of complexity and convenience, automatically tracking activity, and offering insights and the ability to compete with friends.





That was enough when it made its debut early in 2013, but the market for fitness wearables has come a long way since then. Consumers can get a similar experience from a device that costs about one-quarter the price. Xiaomi's Mi Band retails for around $15, yet offers more functionality than the Zip, including sleep tracking, vibrating alarms, and phone call notifications. Buyers miss out on Fitbit's software, but they can make use of alternatives, including Google Fit (labeled one of the best fitness apps by The Verge).
Moving upmarketFitbit reports the number of devices it sells each quarter, but doesn't break out the details for individual models. Still, it seems unlikely that the Zip is selling in massive quantities. In the third quarter, 79% of Fitbit's revenue came from its newer Charge, Charge HR, and Surge models. Fitbit's management has placed greater emphasis on this metric as it has sought to move upmarket. The two trackers Fitbit introduced in 2015 -- the $249 Fitbit Surge and $149 Charge HR -- are the most expensive in the company's history.
Fitbit has likely kept the Zip around as a way to give consumers a cheap entry point into its ecosystem. But even at $60, it's too expensive. Fitbit remains the wearables leader, but other firms are gaining market share. According to research firm IDC, in the third quarter, Xiaomi -- led by surging demand for its cheap Mi Band -- captured 17.4% of the market, a gain of over 800% on an annual basis.
If you're in the market for a Fitbit, and can't afford the higher-end models, you'd be much better served with the Charge, Flex, or One. They're all a bit more expensive than the Zip, but the additional features are worth the higher price.








Sam Mattera has no position in any stocks mentioned. The Motley Fool has no position in any of the stocks mentioned. Try any of our Foolish newsletter services free for 30 days. We Fools may not all hold the same opinions, but we all believe that considering a diverse range of insights makes us better investors. The Motley Fool has a disclosure policy.




















Author








                                Sam Mattera
                            

                                (TMFMattera)
                            

Sam has a love of all things finance. He writes about tech stocks and consumer goods.







Article Info




                    
                    Dec 31, 2015 at 11:06AM
                    
                


                    Technology and Telecom
                












Stocks








Fitbit



                                        NYSE:FIT





                                    $5.22
                                

down



                                    $0.04
                                

                                    (-0.85%)
                                








Read More



3 Beaten-Up Internet of Things Stocks: Are They Bargains?


Can Fitbit Stock Keep Going After Last Week's 10% Pop?


A Foolish Take: Which Companies Dominate the Wearables Market?


Another Tough Quarter for Fitbit


4 Companies That Could Eat Fitbit's Lunch




















Prev


1

2


3


4



Next






Compare Brokers












































Motley Fool push notifications are finally here
Allow push notifications to help you stay on top of...

Breaking investing news
Earnings coverage
Market movers
Special offers and more

Subscribe to notifications
You can unsubscribe at any time.





 



 

Current












Fitbit Inc.'s Worst Product in 2015 @themotleyfool #stocks $FIT







































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














































Fitbit Recalls Force Activity Tracking Wristband | CPSC.gov

































Skip to main content






Languages
简体中文
English
Bahasa Indonesia
한국어
Español
ภาษาไทย
Tiếng Việt





          Text Size: Decrease Font
Increase Font



Contact CPSC



Consumers:



Businesses:






Report an Unsafe Product

Consumers
Businesses










United States
CONSUMER PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION




Search CPSC











Search

















Report an Unsafe Product

Consumers
Businesses






 


HomeRecallsFitbit Recalls Force Activity Tracking Wristband 



Fitbit Recalls Force Activity-Tracking Wristband Due to Risk of Skin Irritation
















En Español 













Note: On February 20, 2014, Fitbit Inc. announced a refund program for the Fitbit Force. This news release serves as the official recall announcement. Consumer contact time has changed, effective 1/11/16.



















Fitbit Force activity-tracking wristband



 












                          ×
                    


Fitbit Force activity-tracking wristband


« Previous


Next »









Name of product:
Wireless activity-tracking wristband


Hazard:
Users can develop allergic reactions to the stainless steel casing, materials used in the strap, or adhesives used to assemble the product, resulting in redness, rashes or blistering where the skin has been in contact with the tracker.


Remedy:
Refund 


Recall date:
March 12, 2014


Recall number:
14-129





Consumer Contact:
Fitbit, toll-free at (888) 656-6381 from M-F 8 a.m. to 5 p.m. ET or online at www.fitbit.com and click on Recall/Safety Info on the right side of the page next to Terms of Use for more information.




Recall Details


In Conjunction With: 






Description:
This recall involves Fitbit ForceTM wireless activity-tracking wristbands with model numbers FB402BK, FB402BKS, FB402SL and FB402SLS. The wristband operates as a pedometer, sleep monitor and watch. It is made of plastic with a stainless steel casing and clasp and a small LED display screen. The display screen is flush with the top side of the band and a control button is on one side of the band. The wristband is about 3/4 inch wide and comes in large and small sizes and in the colors black or slate. The model number is on the back of the recalled wristband below the charging port.

 

Remedy: 
Consumers should contact Fitbit for a full refund.


Incidents/Injuries: 
The firm has received about 9,900 reports of the wristband causing skin irritation and about 250 reports of blistering.


Sold At:
AT&T, Best Buy, Brookstone, Dick's Sporting Goods, Radio Shack, REI, Sports Authority, Target and other stores nationwide, and online at Amazon.com and Fitbit.com from October 2013 to February 2014 for about $130.


Importer: 
Fitbit Inc., of San Francisco 



Manufactured In: 
China


Units: 
About 1,000,000 in the U.S. and about 28,000 in Canada



            Report an Incident Involving this Product          






The U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission is charged with protecting the public from unreasonable risks of injury or death associated with the use of
          thousands of types of consumer products under the agency’s jurisdiction. Deaths, injuries, and property damage from consumer product incidents cost the
          nation more than $1 trillion annually. CPSC is committed to protecting consumers and families from products that pose a fire, electrical, chemical or
          mechanical hazard. CPSC's work to help ensure the safety of consumer products - such as toys, cribs, power tools, cigarette lighters and household
          chemicals -– contributed to a decline in the rate of deaths and injuries associated with consumer products over the past 40 years.
Federal law bars any person from selling products subject to a publicly-announced voluntary recall by a manufacturer or a mandatory recall ordered by the
          Commission.
To report a dangerous product or a product-related injury go online to www.SaferProducts.gov or call CPSC's Hotline at 800-638-2772 or teletypewriter at
          301-595-7054 for the hearing impaired. Consumers can obtain news release and recall information at www.cpsc.gov, on Twitter @USCPSC or by subscribing
          to CPSC's free e-mail newsletters.



Media Contact
Please use the below phone number for all media requests.

              Phone: (301) 504-7908
              Spanish: (301) 504-7800

View CPSC contacts for specific areas of expertise




Related Recalls  


 iRover Recalls Self-Balancing Scooters/Hoverboards Due to Fire Hazard  

 Polaris Recalls Sportsman 570 All-Terrain Vehicles Due to Fuel Leak, Fire Hazards  

 Corbeau USA Recalls Camlock Seat Harness Belts Due to Fall and Projectile Hazards  

 Polaris Recalls RZR 570 and RZR S 570 Recreational Off-Highway Vehicles Due to Crash and Injury Hazards (Recall Alert) (Recall Alert)  

 TriggerTech Recalls Crossbow And RifleTriggers Due to Injury Hazard  





Search Product Safety Reports
Search Product Safety Reports on Saferproducts.gov 


Find more about government recalls
Recalls.gov


Find recalls from around the world
Global Recall Portal


 
 












×
You are about to leave the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC) public website.


The link you selected is for a destination outside of the Federal Government. CPSC does not control this external site or its privacy policy and cannot attest to the accuracy of the information it contains. You may wish to review the privacy policy of the external site as its information collection practices may differ from ours. Linking to this external site does not constitute an endorsement of the site or the information it contains by CPSC or any of its employees.
Click Ok if you wish to continue to the website; otherwise, click Cancel to return to our site.


Ok
Cancel




 








Fitbit Official Site for Activity Trackers & More



















Products


Fitness Wristbands and Clips




Fitbit Zip®





Fitbit One®





Fitbit Flex 2™





Fitbit Alta™





Heart Rate + Fitness Wristbands




Fitbit Alta HR™
New





Fitbit Charge 2™





Smart Fitness Watches




Fitbit Blaze™





Fitbit Surge™





Wi-Fi Smart Scale




Fitbit® Aria®









FITBIT ACCESSORIES








Designer
Collections






Not sure which product is right for you? FIND YOUR FIT




Why Fitbit

Why Fitbit
What's New
Our Technology

FitScience

About Us



Get Motivated

Fitstar
Events
Blog
FitForGood
Fitbit Premium



App & Dashboard

App Tour
Fitbit Challenges
Compatible Apps



Help

Product Help
Forums
Wear & Care
How-To Videos








Your cart is currently empty. Let's shop



                            Store
                        






                        Dashboard
                        








Your cart is currently empty. Let's shop



Store





Log in


Setup













Fit for Summer sale

Finish the season on a high note with up to $30 off select trackers plus free 2-day shipping on $50+ now through July 28.
Up to $30 off select styles.
Shop the sale










New Accessories
Customize Alta HR & Charge 2 with these stylish bands.



EXPLORE SLEEP STAGES & INSIGHTS
See time in light, deep & REM sleep, plus personalized insights to help you sleep better.



REACH YOUR GOALS WITH FITSTARtm
Recommended video workouts based on your Fitbit activity, plus customizable music.




        
            Fitbit motivates you to reach your health and fitness goals by tracking your activity, exercise, sleep, weight and more.
        
    



Zip



One



Flex 2



Alta


New

Alta HR



Charge 2



Blaze



Surge



Aria






See how Fitbit can help you exercise, eat, sleep & live better



Take a quiz to find the right tracker for you





Learn why people love the Fitbit app






Stay motivated with free events in your city


Get personalized workouts anytime, anywhere



Join the Fitbit Community for tips, inspiration, recipes & more





“Fitbit Blaze is the best wearable yet from Fitbit.”
CHIPCHICK












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









Fitbit Inc. and National Products Inc. - Mobile Accessory Reviews - CNET











Pioneer's Lightning-powered mini speaker is weird but kind of cool
The Rayz Rally, a tiny batteryless, business-grade speakerphone, plugs into your iPhone or iPad and is ready for duty.
by David Carnoy

1:23 



Close




Drag



Autoplay: ON
Autoplay: OFF














CNET
Mobile
Mobile Accessories
Products
Mobile Accessory Reviews
 



 





Your Selections
Clear All

Fitbit Inc.
National Products Inc.





Price








$6 - $10 




$20 - $25 




More than $75 



$
to $
Apply




Manufacturer

                            2
                        






Belkin




BlackBerry




Lenovo




Mace Group - Macally




Motorola




Mobile Accessories: Manufacturer


Samsung




Sony




Targus




IncipioDirect.com




Otter




ACCO Brands




Apple




Adesso, Inc.




Case Logic




Asus




Krusell




Dell, Inc.




HP




Inland Products




Panasonic




Toshiba




Global Marketing Partners




Philips




ViewSonic




AMZER




Archos




Brenthaven




Built NY, Inc.




CODi




Case-mate




Disruptive




Ergotech




Griffin Technology Inc.




Hard Candy




Hard Candy Cases




Imation Enterprises




Incase Designs




Link Depot Corp.




M-edge Accessories




Macsense Connectivity




Marware




Moshi




Octa




Ozaki




Small Dog Electronics




Speck Products




SwitchEasy Limited




Tucano




V7 Videoseven




Xtreme Accessories, LLC.  (XtremeMac)




ZAGG Inc.




ifrogz




jWIN Electronics




Golla




iSkin Inc.




3M




ACECAD, A Subsidiary of Solid Year Group




ATEN Technology




AudioOutfitters, LLC




Blueant Wireless




BoxWave Corporation




Casio Inc.




Covertec




Datalogic




Fellowes Manufacturing




Franklin Covey




Fujitsu




HTC




Hip Street




Honeywell, Inc.




IBM




Informatics, Inc.




LXE




Lenntek




Logitech




Matias Corporation




Microsoft




Monaco Cases




Motion Computing, Inc.




Palm




Psion Teklogix (a subsidiary of Psion PLC)




ROTA America




SIIG Inc.




Sakar International, Inc




Socket Communications




Sumdex, Inc.




Texas Instruments Inc.




UTStarcom




Unitech Electronics




Wasp Bar Code




Zebra Technologies




goTenna




iGo, Inc.




dreamGEAR/iSound




SOLO




Franklin Electronic Publishers




Garmin




Tripp Lite




TomTom




Digital Innovations




General Electric




The Joy Factory




Verbatim Corp.




AAMP of America




AFC Trident




ALS Industries




APC




Accessory Power




AccessoryGeeks.com




AccessoryGenie.com




Acme Made




Activision




Adobe




Adonit




Aduro Products, LLC




Advantus Corp




Agent 18




AlertLine Communications Inc.




Alpine Electronics




Aluratek, Inc.




Amazon




American Covers, Inc.




American DJ




American International




Amplivox Sound Systems




Amstron Corporation




Arkon Resources, Inc




Arri Group




Atari




Atlantic Technology




Atlantic, Inc.




Audio-Technica




Audiovox Corporation




Avenues In Leather




Axis Communications




BDA




Bazooka Mobile Audio




Behringer




Bensussen, Deutsch & Associates




BigBen Interactive




Bluelounge Design




Bluesmart




Body Glove




Bogen Photo Corp.




Bose Corp.




Bracketron, Inc.




Brady Corporation




Broan-NuTone LLC




Brother International




C2G




CNet Technology Inc.




CP Technologies




CTA Digital




Califone International Inc.




Canon




Carved




Caseable




Celestron




Cell Pig




CellRanger




Cellet Products




Channel Vision




Chief Sanus Audio Visual




Cisco




Clearwire




Cobra Electronics




Cocoon




Cocoon Innovations




Cokin




ConnecteDevice Ltd




Contour Design




Creative




Cricket




Crosley Radio




Crumpler




CyberPower




DBtechnologies




Da-Lite Screen Company, Inc




Dantona Industries, Inc.




Datel Design & Development Ltd




DayDeal.com




DeLorme Mapping Co.




Deflect-O




Denon




DiCAPac




Digital Concepts




Digital Lifestyle Outfitters




Digital Products International




Directed Electronics Inc.




Dolica Corporation




Draper Inc




Duracell Inc.




ECBC




Eichhof Holding AG Ltd. (Datacolor)




Electro Source, LLC




Elinca




Empire Interactive




EnGenius Tech Inc.




EnerPlex




Energizer




Enustech. Inc.




Epson




Eton Corporation




Ewa-marine




Falcon Safety Products




Flash Ventures




Fluke




Freedom Input Ltd




Fujifilm




Funkwerk Americas Inc




Furman Sound, Inc.




GBC




Gamer Graffix




Gator Cases




Gecko Gear Australia




Gefen




GelaSkins Inc.




Generic




Gepe Produkte AG




Gilsson Technologies




Gitzo




Google




Gossen




Great Stuff




H20 Audio




HOSA Technology, Inc.




Hakuba Photo Industry Co., Ltd.,




Hama GmbH & Co KG




Hardigg Industries, Inc.




Harman




Hawking Technologies




Hi-Capacity




Higher Ground Gear




HoMedics




Hori




Humminbird




ION Audio




IdeaStream Consumer Products, LLC.




Ingenico




Ingram




Init




Intec




IntelliTouch Communications




Intelligent Energy




Interwork Technologies Inc.




Intuitive Motion Inc.,




JVC




Jabra




Jack of All Games




Jelco, Inc.




Just Wireless




KOBO, Inc.




KONNET Technology Inc




Keen Shoes




Kenu




Kinamax




Kodak




Koss Corp.




Kroo




Kyocera




LEE Filters




LG




Lowepro




Lastolite




Lenmar Enterprises Inc.




Leviton




LifeProof




Lightware




Linear Corporation




Livescribe, Inc.




Logbar Inc.




Lomo




Lowel




Minimal




MMF Industries




MOIXA ENERGY LTD




MTV




Mace Pro Security Products




Mad Catz




Made Products Inc.




Magellan




Mamiya America Corporation




Manfrotto




Maxell




McKlein




Meade Instruments Corp.




Mediis Technologies LTD




Merkury Innovations




Metra Electronics Corporation




Metz-Werke GmbH & Co. KG




Michelin Group




Michley Electronics, Inc.




Midland Consumer Radio




Mitsubishi




Mizco International




Mobile Edge




Monoprice




Monster




Mophie




MusicSkins




NAVIGON, Inc.




NEC Corporation




Nady Systems Inc.




Naki International




National Geographic




National Products Inc.




Naztech Wireless Technologies




NetGear




Nikon Inc.




Niles Audio Corp.




Nintendo




Nite Ize, Inc.




Nokia




Norazza, Inc.




North American Battery Company




Novatel Wireless Inc.




Nvidia




Nyko Technologies




OP/TECH USA




Offspring Technologies




Ogio




Olympus




Optech USA




PC Treasures, Inc.




PM Company




Pacific Accessory Corporation




Pad & Quill




PanaVise Products, Inc.




Panamax




Pandigital




Parrot Company




Peerless Industries




Pelican Accessories




Pelican Products




Performance Designed Products, LLC




Pioneer




Pocket Solutions, Inc.




PointMobl




Polycom Inc.




PortaBrace, Inc.




Power Acoustik Electronics




Psyclone Competition Grade




Pyle Audio




QDOS




QSC Audio Products, Inc.




QVS




Qmadix




RCA




RadioShack




React Accessories




Rivet International




Rocketfish




Rotatrim




Rubbermaid




Russound




SIGMA




SKB Industrial




SLD Marketing Group LLC




STM




Sabrent Co., Ltd.




Safco




Saitek




Salamander Designs Ltd.




Salom America Company




Samsonite Corp USA




Scosche Industries, Inc.




Seek Thermal




Sennheiser




Sentry Industries, Inc.




Sharp




Shinybow Technology Co., Ltd.




Shuttle Computer, Inc.




Sima Products




Simgo Mobile ltd.




Simplism




Skooba Design




Skque




Skullcandy




Slappa




Slik Corporation




Sonostar, Inc.




Sony Ericsson




SpeakerCraft




Spectra Merchandising International




Sportline




StarTech




Steren Electronics




StreetWires




SuperTooth




Switch Easy




T-Mobile




TYLT




Tackform Technology




Tamrac, Inc.




Tamron USA, Inc




Technocel




TekNmotion




TeknoCreations Inc.




Tely Labs




Tenba




The Tiffen Company




ThermaPAK Technologies




Thermaltake Technology Inc.




Timbuk2




ToCAD America Inc.




Tom Bihn




TrackR




Tune Belt




Twig




Typo Products




UNITED STATIONERS




USA Spec




Urban Factory




VALCOM INC




Vaja Corp.




Valor Multimedia




ValuSoft




Vanguard (USA), Inc.




Vantage Point Products Corp.




Vector Networks, Inc.




Ventev Innovations




Verge




Verizon Wireless




Vidis GmbH




Vidpro Corporation




Viking Components Inc.




Voxred International LLC




WESTCOTT




Wacom Technology Corp.




Wagan




Walt Disney Co.




Wenger N.A.




WiLife




Wilson Electronics




Wingspan Investment Partners I, LLC




Wireless Xcessories Group




Xentris LLC.




Yamaha




Zeikos Inc.




dexim Santom




eMotion, Inc.




eReplacements




everki




ezGear




i.Tech Dynamic Limited




iOgrapher LLC




iWatchz




Aquapac International Limited




Novoflex




Cables Unlimited




JAVOedge.com




NLU Incorporated




Outpac Designs Ltd.




Boss Audio Systems




Spigen




Fugoo




Photographic Research Organization (Promaster)




iClever




Barska




Brunton




Cygnett




Eachine




Emerge Technologies, Inc.




Kanex




Lepow




MetroMile Inc.




SPECTRALINK CORP




Tech21




Sprint




Arista Interactive LLC




TREXTA




Anymode




CM4




Callpod, Inc.




Pantech & Curitel




Seidio, Inc.




Sena Cases




Skech




aevoe Inc.




zCover Inc.




Mattel Inc.




Musubo




Battery-Biz Inc.




CMO America




Digital Blue




Anchor Audio Inc.




ClearOne Communications




DEDOTEC USA, Inc.




Fender




JTL Corp.




Kowa Company, Ltd.,




Marshall Electronics Inc.




Odyssey Systems, Inc.




Samson Technologies Corp.




Twelve South LLC.




ASSA ABLOY




MTX Audio




National Products




Ballistic




JL Audio Inc.




MARATHON




Allsop, Inc.




Patriot Memory




Accell




Hitcase




Leica Camera, Inc.




Gear Head




IK Multimedia Production




Flir




Bling my Thing




Gumdrop Cases




Infernal Innovations




MiPow




Conair




4XEM Corporation




Cirago International Ltd.




Rane Corporation




Shure Inc.




Smith-Victor Corp.




Vivitar




AT&T




Ergotron Inc




Team ProMark




G-Form




Smead Manufacturing




Grace Digital Inc.




HornetTek




Manhattan Associates




Master Lock Company




Odoyo




Rokform




SDI Technologies Inc.




Sonim




Splash




Superior Communications




Topeak




idox




Greenlee Textron




Quirky




Tech | 21




Thule




ZTYLUS




foneGEAR




Anker




Teledex Inc.




Just Mobile




Acer




Greatshield




Aleratec, Inc




Avaya




Battery Technology Inc. (BTI)




Bretford Manufacturing Inc




Elgato Systems, LLC




I/OMagic Corporation




IOGear




Original Power




Premiertek




Rosewill Inc.




XPal Power




Onkyo




PhoneSuit




StudioPhonic




VSN Mobil




EasyAcc




ProProductsonline.com




Teleway Industrial




Gemini Sound Products Corp.




Techlink International




B&W International




Traveler's Choice




Tension Labs, Inc.




Ten One Design LLC




Bury Technologies




Celltronix




Huawei Technologies Co., Ltd.




RooCase




GPS Outfitters




ModeLabs




Pivothead




ProtecT Keyboard Covers




Intel




MightySkins




Cole Haan




E-Motion




I-Blason




OmegaBrandess




Brando Workshop




Eagle Tech Computers, Inc.




KYE Systems America Corporation




Powermat




Satechi




Tumi




Telex Computer Audio Products




BLU Products




Ematic




fitBAG




Osomount




TESSCO Technologies Incorporated




Fonesalesman Ltd




iOttie, Inc.




olloclip




Empire Scientific




Photoflex Products Inc




Seal Shield




Richard Solo




Chimera Lighting




Photogenic Professional Lighting




Steiner Optik




Tele Vue Optics, Inc.




Wireless Extenders Inc.




Cellphone-Mate, Inc.




Fostex America




iPWR




thinkTANK Photo




Schneider Electric




Mass Fidelity




CipherLab




MagTek




Phottix




iBolt




Bron Elektronik AG




Kate Spade




Lazy-Hands




Advanced Wireless Solutions LLC




Kmashi




Skinomi




iKross




Centon Electronics




SolPro




The Music People!




New Potato Technologies




Rain Design Inc




Nike




Clip-A-Phone




Uniden America Corp.




VariZoom Lens Controls




VTech Holdings




Comprehensive Video Group




Hoffco Brands




Best Buy




Lowrance Electronics, Inc.




Exelium




ACE CAD Enterprise




VisionTek Inc.




Native Union




Braven




Xantrex Technology




GrandTec USA




ZTE




EMTEC, Inc.




SplitFish GameWare




Audioengine Corp.




Amped Wireless




Vantec Inc.




Infinite Technologies




Sonos, Inc.




Penpower




Polaroid Corp.




TEAC America Inc.




Fanny Wang Headphone Company




Syba Tech




id America




Sena Technologies




The KATA Group




Adorama Camera, Inc




Alesis




Atlas Sound




Blue Microphones




Breffo




ChicBlvd Inc.




Cooler Master




Custom Brackets




DJI




Dewalt




Emporia




Fitbit Inc.




Fusion Electronics Limited




INOITULOS S.L.




Ikelite Underwater Systems




International Parkside Products




KIRK telecom




Keyspan




Kinetronics Corporation




Klipsch




Lexerd




Mavizen Limited




Meridrew Enterprises




Miccus, Inc.




Netatmo




Nextivity




Read-Rite




Sirius XM Radio




Spotwave Wireless Inc




Swissvoice




The Buzz Killers




TrafficGauge, Inc.




Veho




iCleaner




iGrip




Insten




WildCharge, Inc




Revolve Electronics, Inc.




Snom Technology




Cokem International Ltd.




Martian Watches




Nomad Goods




Proporta Ltd




Shoulderpod




Technuity, Inc.




Quantum Instruments, Inc.




Wireless One




Cyber Acoustics, LLC




Numark Industries LLC




Third Rail Mobility, LLC




Kenneth Cole




Nikura




The Padcaster LLC




Compucessory




Rand McNally




YourWirelessSource




Voxx International




Xantech Corporation




Fuel3D




Tile, Inc.




Hitachi




IClooly




Konftel




LeapFrog




First International Digital




Oakley, Inc.




Witti




Trianium




Peak Design




M-Audio




Shaxon Industries




Burris




Yuneec




Romoss




WrapSol




KB Covers




Avantronics




Bolt Power




WakaWaka




Digital Peripheral Solutions




Victor Hasselblad AB




Cross Pen Computing Group




X-Doria




Beats by Dre




Plantronics




Ampergen




Core Gamer Inc.




Fossil, Inc.




Perm-A-Store, Inc.




Skybell




Vocopro




Axiom Memory Solutions




In Focus Systems, Inc.




JOBY Inc.




Handspring




Native Instruments USA




Newer Technology




Westone Laboratories, Inc.




3Com Direct




Stacked Powered, LLC




Excalibur Electronics




Polyconcept USA




ARCAM




Bell'O International




EHang




FLIR Systems




PNY Technologies Inc.




ROLI




Rockford Corporation




Telefunken




Tether Tools




Under Armour




iPhoneck




Anycom, Inc.




Cambridge Audio




Discwasher




Pacific Design, Ltd.




Polk Audio, Inc.




SI5.COM




Spec Tools




Staples




Chauvet Lighting




Key Digital




Monarch Education & Computer Furniture




Presonus Audio Electronics, Inc.




iRiver




Aurora Multimedia




Carl ZEISS




Carson Optical




Dane Electronics




Joytech




Lectrosonics, Inc.




Lexar Media Inc.




Lumedyne, Inc




Maha Energy Corporation




Matthews Studio Equipment




Peavey Electronics Corporation




Primera Technology




Ultimate Support Systems




Vextra Technologies, LLC




Wintec




Revolabs




WizDex Corp




Bravoview Technology




Clarion




LaCie Ltd.




Chipolo




Invoxia




Kaito Electronics




Merge VR




Pixie Technology




Plume Labs




i-BLADES




Bellus3D




Datavideo USA




Sekonic Professional Division (Mamiya America Corporation)




VIXEN CO., LTD.




Milante




V-Moda




American Tourister




humantoolz




3Dconnexion




Grundorf Corporation




PENN ELCOM INC




Ted Baker




VISION




NetScout




A.T. Cross Company




Denaq




Emporia Telecom




Michael Kors




Sanyo




VuPoint Solutions




White Diamonds




Universal Remote Control, Inc.




Shortcut Labs




Zerotech




Acme




Ricoh




Riva Case




M & S Systems




ORTOFON INC.




Sanho




Ampy




Zolt




Cardo Systems, Inc.




Janam Technologies




Sling Media




Apogee Electronics Corporation




Logic3




i2 electronics




American Microsystems, Ltd.




Gamber-Johnson




General Dynamics Itronix




Hobbico




Integral Office Comunicaciones




Interworks Unlimited




JK Audio




JLab Audio, Inc.




Speco Technologies




Swarovski Optik




Yuasa Battery, Inc.




iDeaUSA




Cyber Clean




SRS Labs, Inc.




Catterpillar Inc




Bower Incorperated




Mujjo




Stebco LLC




Supersonic, Inc.




Wahoo Fitness




Audio Power Industries




EK Ekcessories




Ergoguys




Fusion Computer




Premier




Athena Technologies




Honeywell Imaging and Mobility




Slacker, Inc.




Cowon Systems, Inc.




DigiCom Digital




Gomadic Corp.




Key Tronic Corp.




Knoll Systems




Lava Computer MFG Inc.




Lensbabies, LLC




M-ROCK




Pentax




Roland Corporation




Total Micro Technologies




Victory




Welch Allyn Inc.




XGearlive




Aiptek Inc




American Recorder Technologies




Antec Inc.




Arsenal Gaming




BatMax Corporation




BenQ America Corp.




Beyond Cell International




Blockhead




CRU-DataPort




Case It




Coolmax Technology, Inc.




CradlePoint, Inc.




Craig Electronics




Cremax USA Corporation




Datamation Systems, Inc.




Dicota GmbH




Dr. Bott LLC




Elite Screens Inc.




Flexiglow




Hoodman Corporation




IDAmerica




IOmounts




InVision Software




Innergie




Lifeworks




Lorex Technology




Lucent Technologies




Nonda




PODSTA




Pantone, Inc.




Pharos Science & Applications Inc.




Polaris Software




Random House




Rayovac Corporation




Smartparts




Soundstream Technologies Corp.




SwitchEasy




Symantec




The House of Marley




Thuraya Satellite Telecommunications Company




Uncommon




UpBeat Audio, Inc.




XSories




ZeroChroma LLC




lexibook




Advanced Bridging Technologies, Inc.




Ascendeo




Atdec Pty Ltd




Avaya Inc.




Barnes & Noble




BoomerangIt, Inc.




Brodit




CD3 Storage Systems




CableWholesale




ClearSounds




CompanionLink Software




Delphi Corp.




Dice Electronics




Digitech (A Harman International Company)




Digium, Inc.




EarHugger, Inc.




Elago




Elmo Integrated Systems




Fiberlok




Forward Industries




Fosnom




Furuno Electric Co., Ltd.




GIZMON




Gateway




Grado Labs Inc.




Graphsim Entertainment




HUBBELL INC -CL A




Hali-Power




InnoPocket




Intermec




Jivo Technology




Kenwood




Kinyo Company Inc.




LifeView Inc.




Lind Electronics, Inc.




Micro Accessories




Micro Innovation Computers




Micro Innovations




MicroSpareParts




Mitel, Inc.




NewTrent Inc.




Nexpak




Nextar




Nextel Communications Inc.




NoviiMedia




Optoma




Pentel Of America Ltd




Performance Technologies




Phoenix Gold




Pico Macom




Piel




Power Support USA




Powercam Inc.




Proficient Audio Systems




Qualcomm Inc.




Radio Shack




SMARTHOME.COM




SOL Republic




Saunders Mfg. Co. Inc.




Sonnet Technologies, Inc.




Super Micro Computer Inc.




Symbol Technologies




THB Bury




TRIMBLE NAVIGATION LTD




Tech Data Corp




The Betesh Group (Motion Systems)




Vivitar Corp.




Vizio




Voyager Systems




Voyetra Turtle Beach




Westinghouse




X10 Wireless Technology Inc.




Z-Line Designs




Zenith Electronics Corporation




Aukey




Compact Power Systems




Guillemot Corp.




Nixon USA




Paris Business Products




Powertraveller




Preco New Products Corp.




Radica Games LTD




iBIZ Technology Corp.



Apply Filters
Cancel





See more









  





1 – 4 of 4 
                                                            for:

                
                                                                                                                                        "Fitbit Inc." or                                                                                                                                             "National Products Inc." 
 Sort by:










$23.99
at Best Buy






                Fitbit Blaze Nylon Band
                            

Color: olive






$81.99
at Sonic Electronix Inc.






                Mount Ball Mount Heavy Duty
                            







$16.95
at Amazon Marketplace






                Clamp Mount 1/2 To 1 1/4
                            







$9.49
at Amazon Marketplace






                Holder For Garmin 176 Series
                            




 














 Related                            Deals                and                Promotions

 All                            Deals


Gravity X Smartphone Car Mount for $20 + $2 s&h
$20.00

Gravity X Smartphone Car Mount for $20 + $2 s&h





iPhone 6, 6s Wallet Case, Durable and Slim, Lightweight with Classic Design & Ultra-Strong Magnetic Closure , Faux Leather
$16.14

iPhone 6, 6s Wallet Case, Durable and Slim, Lightweight with Classic Design & Ultra-Strong Magnetic Closure , Faux Leather





Splashsound Shower Speaker - Waterproof Bluetooth Shower Speaker with Suction Cup, Hanging Clip and Micro SD Card Slot – Clear 5W Audio Output
$8.99

Splashsound Shower Speaker - Waterproof Bluetooth Shower Speaker with Suction Cup, Hanging Clip and Micro SD Card Slot – Clear 5W Audio Output






 

iPhone 7 Screen Protector & Case Combo, Allovit 2-Pack Tempered Glass Screen Protector and Crystal Clear Case, Dual Layer Protection Cover for iPhone 7 4.7"
$7.49

iPhone 7 Screen Protector & Case Combo, Allovit 2-Pack Tempered Glass Screen Protector and Crystal Clear Case, Dual Layer Protection Cover for iPhone 7 4.7"





Google Pixel XL Case, YOUMAKER Full-body Rugged Belt Clip Holster Case with Built-in Screen Protector for Google Pixel 5.5 inch (2016 Release)
$12.74

Google Pixel XL Case, YOUMAKER Full-body Rugged Belt Clip Holster Case with Built-in Screen Protector for Google Pixel 5.5 inch (2016 Release)





Samsung Gear VR Headset for $30 + free shipping
$30.00

code: DNSAM15
Samsung Gear VR Headset for $30 + free shipping






 


 


 


 


 







 













































































            
    Fitbit Inc.'s Best Product in 2015 -- The Motley Fool

        








 












Skip to main content



The Motley Fool


Fool.com


Fool.co.uk


Fool.com.au


Fool.ca


Fool.sg


Fool.de





                Helping the world invest better since 1993.
            




Hi, Fool!




                    Premium Advice






                    Help

 Fool Answers
 Contact Us




Login





























Search

	    Search:
	







































Fitbit Inc.'s Best Product in 2015
The Charge HR made its debut in January, and has remained among the most popular fitness trackers all year.











                Sam Mattera
            

                (TMFMattera)



            
            Dec 30, 2015 at 10:50AM
            
            






Fitbit Charge HR. Photo: Fitbit

Fitbit (NYSE:FIT) sells a half-dozen different wearables, including the inexpensive Fitbit Zip and high-end Fitbit Surge. But its single best tracker, and its best new product of 2015, is the Fitbit Charge HR. The device, released earlier this year, has become a major driver of Fitbit's business, garnering rave reviews and topping the list of best-selling fitness trackers, beating out many rivals, including Garmin's (NASDAQ:GRMN) suite of alternatives.
Dominating the middleThe Charge HR is Fitbit's second-most expensive tracker, but, retailing for around $130, straddles the middle of the wearables market. It's considerably less expensive than most smartwatches -- the least expensive Apple (NASDAQ:AAPL) Watch is $349 -- but more expensive than simple trackers like Xiaomi's $15 Mi Band.
Its functionality also lies somewhere in between. It can't run third-party apps or display most notifications. But it does offer reliable step tracking, sleep data, and a heart-rate monitor. It's not particularly stylish, but given its slim profile, it isn't conspicuous. It connects to Fitbit's highly regarded app, and syncs with virtually every sort of PC and mobile device available. Its battery lasts several days. For these reasons, reviewers have consistently recommended the Charge HR over its competitors.
"No heart-rate band costs this little, feels this small, and connects to as good an app ... It's the all-in-one fitness band I'd buy, especially for its low price ... none of the other watches and bands have been able to beat it at its own fitness game," wrote CNet's Scott Stein.
"The Charge HR is a good tool for monitoring daily activity and moderate workouts, and for getting better insight into what your body is doing....I would absolutely recommend it to my family and friends," wrote Wired's Josh Valcarcel.





"The Fitbit Charge HR is an excellent fitness tracker and continuous heart rate monitor, powered by the outstanding Fitbit website and mobile apps. For anyone looking to get into daily activity tracking, it's a wonderful device that measures things about your life that actually matter," wrote PCMag's Jill Duffy.
The Charge HR competes with a wide variety of trackers, but Garmin's Vivosmart HR may be the most direct alternative. It includes most of the same features, and is priced about the same as the Charge HR, but excels in one aspect: unlike the Charge HR, it's waterproof. Still, reviewers have continued to recommend the Charge HR over Garmin's tracker. Reviewing the Vivosmart HR, PCMag's Timothy Torres recommended that consumers "Get the Garmin band if you need something waterproof. But for everyone else, the Fitbit Charge HR remains a stronger choice."
Fitbit leads the competitionFitbit has stayed atop IDC's wearable tracker chart in 2015. In the second quarter, it captured 24.3% of the market, edging out Apple, which captured 19.9%. Both firms saw their unit shipments rise in the third quarter, but their market share fall, down to 22.2% and 18.6%, respectively.
Fitbit reports how many devices it sells each quarter, but it doesn't break out individual models. Still, it's likely that the Charge HR -- which made its debut in January 2015 -- was a significant contributor to its 2015 dominance. In the third quarter, the Charge, Charge HR, and Surge accounted for 79% of FitBit's revenue, and research firm NPD Group reported that the Charge HR was the best-selling fitness tracker in the U.S. from April to September.





Fitbit shares rose on Monday after its app soared to the top of Apple's App Store chart. Presumably, those additional downloads were driven by new Fitbit owners unwrapping trackers -- possibly Charge HRs -- on Christmas.



Sam Mattera has no position in any stocks mentioned. The Motley Fool owns shares of and recommends Apple. Try any of our Foolish newsletter services free for 30 days. We Fools may not all hold the same opinions, but we all believe that considering a diverse range of insights makes us better investors. The Motley Fool has a disclosure policy.




















Author








                                Sam Mattera
                            

                                (TMFMattera)
                            

Sam has a love of all things finance. He writes about tech stocks and consumer goods.







Article Info




                    
                    Dec 30, 2015 at 10:50AM
                    
                


                    Technology and Telecom
                












Stocks








Apple



                                        NASDAQ:AAPL





                                    $149.93
                                

down



                                    $0.63
                                

                                    (-0.42%)
                                










Garmin



                                        NASDAQ:GRMN





                                    $51.48
                                

down



                                    $0.40
                                

                                    (-0.77%)
                                










Fitbit



                                        NYSE:FIT





                                    $5.22
                                

down



                                    $0.04
                                

                                    (-0.85%)
                                








Read More



3 Beaten-Up Internet of Things Stocks: Are They Bargains?


Can Fitbit Stock Keep Going After Last Week's 10% Pop?


A Foolish Take: Which Companies Dominate the Wearables Market?


Another Tough Quarter for Fitbit


4 Companies That Could Eat Fitbit's Lunch




















Prev


1

2


3


4



Next






Compare Brokers












































Motley Fool push notifications are finally here
Allow push notifications to help you stay on top of...

Breaking investing news
Earnings coverage
Market movers
Special offers and more

Subscribe to notifications
You can unsubscribe at any time.





 



 

Current












Fitbit Inc.'s Best Product in 2015 @themotleyfool #stocks $AAPL, $GRMN, $FIT






































	Fitbit, Inc. - Home



































NYSE: FIT
$
5.23
-0.04
-0.76%
Volume: 
2,066,556

July 28, 2017







Store





















Home














Sec Filings


Contact IR


Faq


Snapshot













BLOG









About Us
|
Careers
|
Retailers
|
Affiliates
|
Corporate Wellness
|
API
|
Help




        © Copyright 2017 Fitbit Inc. All rights reserved.
    



Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Returns & Warranty
Wear and Care
Recall & Safety Info
















	Fitbit, Inc. - Press - Press Releases



































NYSE: FIT
$
5.23
-0.04
-0.76%
Volume: 
2,066,556

July 28, 2017







Store





















Home»Press»Press Releases

























Sec Filings


Contact IR


Faq


Snapshot





Press Releases


Press Kit


Contact PR


Contact IR













BLOG









About Us
|
Careers
|
Retailers
|
Affiliates
|
Corporate Wellness
|
API
|
Help




        © Copyright 2017 Fitbit Inc. All rights reserved.
    



Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Returns & Warranty
Wear and Care
Recall & Safety Info
















	Fitbit, Inc. - Press - Press Kit






































NYSE: FIT
$
5.23
-0.04
-0.76%
Volume: 
2,066,556

July 28, 2017







Store



























Home»Press»Press Kit










Fitibit Logo


Fitbit Products

Fitbit Surge
Fitbit Blaze
Fitbit Charge 2

Fitbit Alta HR
Fitbit Alta

Fitbit Flex 2

Fitbit One
Fitbit Zip
Fitbit Aria
Fitbit Family



Fitbit Software

Fitbit App
Sleep Stages & Sleep Insights
Community

Personal Goal Setting
Fitbit Adventures



Fitbit Videos



Fitstar by Fitbit

Fitstar by Fitbit Logo
Fitstar Personal Trainer
Fitstar Personal Trainer - Lifestyle Images
Fitstar Personal Trainer - Trainers
Fitstar Yoga




Designer Collections for Fitbit

PUBLIC SCHOOL for Fitbit
Simply Vera Vera Wang for Fitbit
Tory Burch for Fitbit



Works with Fitbit

Amazon Echo
Habit
NBA 2K
Peloton
VirZOOM



Fitbit Group Health

UnitedHealthCare



Social Responsibility

Fitbit Step It Up! Challenge
FitForGood



Press Releases










New Products and Services






Fitbit Alta HR





See more







Fitbit Sleep Stages & Sleep Insights




See more







Fitbit Charge 2




See more




























Sec Filings


Contact IR


Faq


Snapshot













Press Releases


Press Kit


Contact PR


Contact IR















BLOG









About Us
|
Careers
|
Retailers
|
Affiliates
|
Corporate Wellness
|
API
|
Help




        © Copyright 2017 Fitbit Inc. All rights reserved.
    



Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Returns & Warranty
Wear and Care
Recall & Safety Info
















	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































